Went here for dinner the other night and had a lovely meal.  I ended up getting 3 appetizers (the cheese, mussels & a salad), and my boyfriend got a chicken dish with veggies.  They have a very extensive menu and it was hard to pick just one thing!  They also have a nice selection of wine.  The only letdown for me was the bread - nothing special. The service was extremely warm & friendly, and the staff and owner stopped by multiple times to check on us. We used valet as it was 8pm on a weeknight in downtown PA, and parking can be a bit of a pain. Looking forward to going back and trying other dishes.
3 stars for me.  I'd go 3.5 if it were allowed. I didn't know what to expect coming here really.  It had a nice look to it, a live jazz band playing in the background, a nice bar near the front and friendly staff welcoming curious people in. Decided to give it a shot. The positives: -the band wasn't overly loud and was actually pretty good. -nice decor, good sized place, dim lighting. -friendly staff. -above average food. --noteworthy items:  Fried zuchinni flower small plate.  Beet and goat cheese salad.  Grilled octopus.  Braised short rib on polenta (minus the damn lemon zest sprinkled generously on top). -full wine bar. -dishes were medium sized.  which is larger than i expected for a place like this. -tables near the window can people-watch all the silliness of university avenue on a friday evening. The neutral (because i wouldn't really say these were full out negatives): -free bread was okay.  not warm, not cold.  not tasty, not bland. -chickpea pancake with olive tepenade was ehh... -lemon zest any dish.  meh.  shame on you. -the prices were just okay.  about what i expected to see.  triple digits, 2 people, pre-alcohol, pre-tip. I'd probably come back.
o man..the meat board..lovely...the short ribs were hella good..should of gotten that.. i had the grilled fish..it was ok..more on the healthy side..which was nice..they do let u sub out potatoes...that was awesome..i had asparagus and brussel sprouts with greens..it wasn't bad...just that i was hungry still.. panna cotta? off the hook..lava cake? o man it was good..but i still like the panna cotta more.. i came here for a bridal shower..n glad they all liked it..the food was good..n we had our own lil area...i think overall service was really good..people were nice..not really rushed...everyone was hungry..amazing..would come back..would be great if they change the menu often tho..
Great restaurant! Friendly and efficient service. Love the atmosphere, and the wine selection is excellent. I've been there several times, and have never been disappointed. Highly recommended!
We went there to listen to the live jazz music they were playing. We had the best Chardonnay I've ever had! Wonderful place! We'd definitely go back there again!
I went here last night for dinner, and what I loved most about Lavanda was not the food, but the superb service we received. I wish I got her name, but she was a very friendly brunette who treated us as if we were the only ones in the restaurant. She brought me several wines to try until I found one that I liked, and had a heavy hand when pouring our wine ;) If this rating was just for service, I would have absolutely given Lavanda five stars. Unfortunately, I was less than impressed by the food, and for that reason, it only gets three stars (although my friends did seem to like what they ordered). I ordered the baked penne with tomatoes, peas, ricotta, parmesan and mozzarella (against my better judgment), and was rewarded in kind with a tasteless, unimaginative dish that left much to be desired. Next time, I'll avoid the pastas and give one of the other entrees a time.
Eh. I could take it or leave it. The ambiance is nice - nothing really fancy, more inviting and cozy than anything. It's what I'd like to picture my great aunt's house in France looks like... if I had a great aunt who lived in France. The wine is okay, but seems spendy for what it is. I'm not talking labels or vintage, I'm talking deliciousness. The wines we had were drinkable, certainly, but didn't score way high up on the Delicious Meter. The food? Okay as well. PIC had the chicken, which he liked. I had the duck, which I was disappointed in. When I order duck, I want to taste the rich, slightly fattiness that is the duck. What I tasted was all the seasoning - that duck could've been a chicken for all I know.
I thought the place was okay. They had good music, Full bar and decent food. I'd go back there.
I came here with a big group of girls for a friend's bachelorette party dinner. We had planned ahead in advance, so the table was ready for seventeen heady celebratory girls when we arrived on the scene. I love all the windows, the warm colors and decor, and ambiance of this restaurant. It's not a fancy restaurant, but it would give a date a very special, romantic feel. Service was great, and our server was very attentive to our needs. Here's what we ordered: - Baked penne: Good but nothing particularly special - Roast chicken: A bit dry and bland in the middle of the breast, but it was definitely one of the highlights of the night - Duck: Good, but the sauce on the duck had too much sweet/sour flavor going on, which made you not able to taste the duck - Grilled New York steak: Nothing to write home about, a pretty average take on steak - Chopped salad: Plain, but was highly recommended by our server, so we ordered it - Charred squid: Save yourself and don't order this dish which is so salty - Spaghetti frutta di mare: Good but not enough sauce and dry The desserts were really delicious: We had the molten lava cake, panna cotta, and flourless chocolate cake... so good! The desserts and the service really saved this meal. I'll probably be back to give this restaurant a second chance, but it was kind of a let-down.
Very disappointing meal. I order the mixed seafood grill with skewered veggies. The dish arrived with some very dried out looking morsels of fish surrounded by withered fragments of veggies on a stick. I felt as though the meal was turned in by another diner and was placed under a salamander until someone else ordered it. Unfortunately that was me.
Came here for a Prefix Special Dinner on a Sunday for a birthday party. The  atmosphere was nice and classy and live music definitely added a nice touch to the whole experience. My favorite part of the entire dinner was the wine. I had the white wine, "10 Rodolfo,Torrontes, Argentina," to be exact. It was mind-blowingly delicious! Tasted like liquid honey! I will be purchasing some of that soon for myself (it was that good!). The small plates were tasty, but nothing out of the ordinary. One thing that sort of seemed unusual was the Avocado Bruschetta, which consisted of just avocado on bread, not much of Bruschetta. I would skip the salad and go with the soup. I had the salad and was not impressed, while others who got the soup said it was very very tasty. For main, I had salmon and my boyfriend had the lamb shank. Out of the two the lamb shank was definitely better because salmon was too oily. For dessert, the flourless chocolate cake was yummy, but very very thick in texture. I would recommend pairing it with some coffee or cappuccino. Overall, good experience, good food. The live music was very romantic and set the mood for the night.
Meh. The food was good but nothing to write home about. It was not up to the level I'd expect at that price. We didn't order that much and the bill for 3 of us was over $200. The location is great and the ambience is pleasant. The live music was nice. The service was great until dessert, when it slowed to an unacceptable level. The server knew we had to leave to attend an event. My dessert, the baklava and ice cream, did not entice me to savor it and risk being late. I've had better baklava and ice cream in the local cafes. Even in Palo Alto I could find the same quality food and wine for a lot less, or better quality food, wine, and service for the same price.
Visited this unfortunate restaurant about half a year ago. I would describe it as overpriced food that tastes mediocre at best. Service was terrible. Our waiter didn't seem remotely interested in helping us at all. He ignored us for the majority of the time, and only became helpful at the end in hopes of increasing his tip. Disgusting place. I would give this place a zero if I could.
We had a big group which couldn't get reservation at more popular place few days ahead but this place could. We got bunch of appetizers but I only remembered that the bacon wrapped dates. They were quite good and better than Cascal in Mountain View. I ordered their duck dish but they ran out. Wasn't feeling adventurous and ordered steak.. medium rare. It came out light pink quite evenly which I found curious. Usually the color gradation is from reddish to pinkish brown outwardly. It's really good and different enough of note. Had creme brulee and chocolate cake for desserts. Competent but nothing special. Cozy atmosphere and would come back again for their small plates next time.
wonderful wine bar and great live jazzy classical music on weekend nights. do not order the bar chips though. they are mega gross and deep fried a few times over. expensive glasses of wine it seemed. and they werent even very good at that
I had read some good reviews of this restaurant and was eager to try it.  But I was terribly disappointed.  I am vegan and asked the server if there was any way to prepare a vegan pasta for me.  She had nothing original to offer other than pasta with tomato sauce.  And then the pasta that she delivered was mushy, almost fit not to eat.  I encouraged my fellow diners to try squash blossoms (a delicacy that I have made many times at home) but they came to us smothered with cheese and overpowering the squash blossom itself.  Prices were outrageous considering what we ordered.  Nope, will never go back again.
This restaurant is definitely not tasty or worth the price.  Ordered the frutti di mare, dates, shrimp scampi and the arugula salad.   Everything was on the level of something you can make yourself at home.  I mean yes, the food was edible, but for the price, it was definitely not worth it for the taste.  Total waste of money.  Service was not even that great either.  Tried to get our waitress to take a group picture of our party, but she clearly ignored eye contact with us.  Another waitress was nice enough to come up to us and take the picture, but perhaps she happen to catch our eyes and would look bad if she ignored us, but regardless she was nice enough to help us.  Oh yea, ordered the chocolate lava cake, worse ever!  Cake texture was too soft and horrible tasting.  Sorry, but never again!
I was looking forward to coming here.  I always pass by here in Palo Alto, and i always noticed there was a lot of people here. Food actually wasn't much to think about, it didn't even leave a lasting memory for me and I wasn't very impressed.  Only part I liked about this place was the music they had going and the wine (that we brought ourselves). Parking: plenty of street or structure parking in the area.
It was the worst dinning experience I have ever had so far.  First of the all, the ushers are bimbo.  Both of them had no clues what the seat they should serve us.  Secondary, the duck was all burned when it was served.  I was so disappointed that both the chef and waitress did not notice that.  Thirdly, my grilled salmon was steamed actually.  The culinary skill and finishing touch were at the best mediocre.
Yum! How could I have overlooked this place for so many years! Came here for Valentine's Day dinner and loved it. :) Ambiance was appropriately romantic except that it was of course incredibly crowded with couples. I'm guessing it would be nicer with fewer people there. Everything we got was really good! - pate. can't pass on pate! it came with a bit of spicy mustard on the side. the mustard really brought out the flavor in the pate. mustard + liver + crunchy bread = heaven - pork belly. OMG hands down, the fattiest most delicious pork I've ever had. I swear, it was almost pure fat with a bit of crispy meat attached to it. I thought I was going to DIE eating it. YUM-O. - charred squid. really good. a bit of a let down after the fatty pork, but honestly, nothing could have been better than the pork. - duck confit. perfect for two people. rich, flavorful, plenty of veggies to soak up the sauce. Successful meal, yippee! I'm giving it 4 stars instead of 5 since only the pork belly was truly to die-for amazing. The rest of the items were really good though.
Have been here a few times, I would not reccommend dining here. Food is very overpriced for the quality and is generally bland and boring.  Italian food is pretty hard to screw up and the two entrees we ordered were not impressive.  You would think with a beautiful restaraunt and pricey menu, you'd be in for a gourmet meal, but the food is just average, at best. The wine bar is great though.  Romantic vibe and many choices of different kinds of wines.  They have live music sometimes, which is nice, but is often awkwardly loud because they set up right next to the bar, so people sipping on wine at the bar can't even carry on a conversation due to how loud the jazz band is. There are better restaraunts in downtown PA to go to if you want a nice, romantic, "special occasion" type of feel.
Had a great meal here the other night. Seems that they have a set Mediterranean menu with rotating specials from Croatia. I have to say, "Croatian specialties" was certainly a new genre to my palate. My starter, a chick pea pancake with olive and anchovy tapenade, was fantastic and certainly unique. I had one of the Croatian specials, lamb and beef sausage, as my main course. Absolutely loved it, and the was well complemented and highlighted by tzatziki and especially by a fresh red pepper relish. We had the chance to try two bottles of Croatian red wine, which was certainly a first for me. Really great, dry reds. This seems like a great place to go for a business dinner or a special date. It's got a great atmosphere and is really quiet, so you don't need to yell to have a conversation. A really lovely evening all around.
European cuisine; international clientele Small plates, hot & cold Excellent gambas, beet salad, sardines Great entrees: handkerchief pasta, schnitzel $29 four course Sunday dinners Reasonable prices for good wines Excellent food service by BJ Music on some nights
Lavanda used to be one of our favorite casual getaway dinner places. It serves excellent and... Read more 
Came here for a flight of white wines. You get to choose 3 wines from reds and whites for $15. The size of portions are ok. They don't use regular wine glasses, but weird things that look like those chemistry tubes. I wished they used nicer glasses. The wines I chose were ok. I probably needed some small bites or food to compliment them better. Some wines were a little strong on the alcohol taste. Intimate cozy place.
This evening I entered Lavanda.  Beautiful site, welcoming staff, and a live band.  Nice.  I ordered a flight of 3 wines and they were quite good.   I ordered 3 of their small food plates and they were very poor quality.  The calamari were 90% oil and bread, the "BBQ rib" was 90% bone and white hard fat with no BBQ flavor, and the Croatian olive appetizer I ordered seemed to be mostly salt, breading and oil. I would give Lavanda 4 stars if it were simply a wine bar, but it's clear they present themselves as a restaurant, so alas, I cannot be so kind. Overall it is a great looking place in a great location with attentive staff.  Perhaps I was there on an off night?  Try it yourself and report back! .
It started well with (overpriced) wine and very tasty appetizers. It quickly deteriorated as the main course, dessert and then bill arrived. The appetizers were highlighted by avocado bruscetta and bacon-wrapped dates. Both disappeared very quickly. The main courses were all lack-luster. Nothing tasted as fresh as expected from the "all local" label on the menu. Noone in the party finished their entree. And, with the exception of the bread pudding, the desserts were disappointing. The panna cotta was not good: the texture was too gelatin-like and the strawberries atop of it tasted like more like syrup than fruit. The cheesecake was horrible, neither tasty nor creamy.
We have been regular guests at Lavanda since it opened, but last night was one of our best meals here ever! Over the years the food has changed quite a bit, evolving from French/Italian to more Mediterranean with its unique Croatian specialties. Through out all the changes, the owners and staff have always been wonderful and charming. I'll talk more about the people later, but first the food. To start, we had the "burak", which is a cheesy, eggy quiche-like thing encased in phyllo dough. Served with a nice tangy salad. Would make an excellent lunch on its own. Our second appetizer was the beef carpaccio, always excellent at Lavanda where they make it in a very classic Italian way with arugala and parmesan. For entrees, we shared the pork schnitzel and one of their new pastas, the tagliarini w/nettle pesto. I don't particularly like the marsala sauce with the pork (too sweet for my taste), and asked them to serve it plain with lemon wedges. Outstanding with the braised chard and potatoes. But the star of the evening was the pasta. As good as anything we've had in San Francisco or even Italy. Wonderful home-made pasta with a delicious pesto sauce. The roasted cherry tomatoes gave it even more flavor. For dessert we had the baclava and a mille feuille (custard in phyllo dough). Both are fairly new on the menu, and went wonderfully together. Now, on the service and the people. I'm confounded by the negative reviews here about service at Lavanda. For us, coming here is like dining with old friends who happen to be great cooks and have an amazing wine cellar. The owners, Luca and Bruce, are always perfectly charming, and most of the wait-staff have worked there for years and are knowledgeable and accommodating. The atmosphere is happy and energetic, and especially with the live music on weekends. We have *ALWAYS* had a fabulous time. So, for those whose experiences were not entirely positive, here are some suggestions for enjoying Lavanda: 1) Get to know Luca and Bruce. They will go out of their way to make sure you have a good time. For example, for last night's meal, they brought us the burak and desserts on the house, as well as a couple of glasses of vin santo. Every meal they do something special for us. And it's lovely when they stop by for a chat. 2) Let Luca pick the wine. Lavanda has a very large wine list that we used to pore over. Now we just let Luca pick. He knows our price range, and based on which region we want to try, he has always chosen something delicious. Last night we had a great Sangiovese blend from a small producer in the Maremma region for under $50 and it was fantastic. Never would we have known about this wine. 3) Someone complained about the small hot/cold starters. In my experience, they are almost uniformly good. At $6 with reasonably sized portions that would make nice appetizers, they're a good value. My favorites are the avocado bruschetta, the calarmari (both the grilled and the fried), and the chickpea pancakes. The pastas are also uniformly good. Those of you who complain about price, you can have a very reasonably priced delicious meal with the "small taste" and pasta. I'll end this review with another wine story. Over the past several years, prior to going on vacation, we would "practice" drinking wines from our destination at Lavanda, with their huge wine list. We've done this with Burgandy,Tuscany, Umbria, Catalonia, etc. Last year we were going to Languedoc, where the wines are not exported in great quantities. Bruce went out of his way to actually buy some Minervois for us to try. Isn't that wonderful? I think we are fortunate to have restauranteurs in Palo Alto who really care about their guests' experience. Hope everyone will come to love Lavanda as much as we do :)
Lavanda is by far my favorite restaurant on the Peninsula. My husband and I are regulars. We come... Read more 
I met some folks from work at Lavandia last week. It was my first time there, and I found the service to be good. My water glass was never more than half empty before someone would stop by and fill it up again. The chicken pate was my favorite appetizer although the zuccini chips were divine AND the watermelon and feta/mint was also great. I had the butternut squash soup which had a great creme fraiche design and the heirloom tomato salad.
I have been there once to have some wine with a friend. We didn't want to have dinner that night, and we just wanted to have a place to sit down and chat and have some wine. So we wound up trying out this for the first time. The focal point of the restaurant is definitely the oval shaped bar. It's anchored in the center of the restaurant. The dining tables are mostly placed next to the windows around the restaurant. The wine list was extensive. The staff there were quite friendly, though not all of them were that knowledgeable of wines. We were sitting by the bar that evening. The place was not too loud, a perfect place for wine and conversation. The ambience was warm. Overall, we had a good first-time experience there. I haven't gone back there since, maybe because there wasn't anything standing out enough for me to go back sooner.
They have the most interesting food.  I believe it's Croatian or Mediterranean.  We had a wide variety of food and it was all excellent and unique.  Generally I have a very sensitive stomach when trying new foods, but everything was delicious and easy to handle. Best service in any restaurant I've ever been to!  The server was very friendly and informative, even patient with my 88 year-old-grandmother who asks the same question three times! If you are in Palo Alto, you should definitely check this place out! Oh, and we went early around 5:30 or 6 ish for dinner and we beat the crowds.
We had awesome fusion Croatian/Italian fusion here.  Everything was fresh, cooked perfectly, and presented beautifully.  Service was prompt without being too pushy, ambiance was very pleasant with good live music. Get the watermelon/mint/ricotta appetizer - a totally unexpected surprise.  Our main course was stuffed Hungarian peppers - very rustic and flavorful.  My wife had artichoke with salad - melt in your mouth goodness.  They had neat wines and amazing desserts.  Come here for unique robust food and good drink.  Highly recommended.
The 2-star review is largely due to service, although the food was nothing to write home about, it was not bad, just not great or something to come back for. Mothers day and they are not busy, I came in and was seated right away and while waiting for my mom and dad to show up, not a single person asked if I wanted water, a drink or an appetizer.  My mom and dad show up and they were only 15 minutes late and we look over the menu and make our selections however we have to ask for our waiter to come over. The food arrived fairly quickly, but the waitress never checkin in, and we wanted to get some pepper.  Again we had to find someone to ask for it. The food: we had the eggs benedict, and the scramble, a side of pancakes and coffee.  The eggs were good but the sauce was flavorless, the fruit salad seemed to have every fruit they could find and tossed in there.  The pancakes were very thin and not sure where the ricotta came in but I didn't taste it.
Loved the ambiance and wine. The steak was okay. We came on a weeknight so it wasn't too crowded. Our waitress was efficient .  An okay experience overall.
I've had my eye on this place for a while, as I drive along University Ave. quite a bit. I finally got the chance to check this place out recently with a friend. I didn't realize it was such fine dining so I was grubbing it in my jeans and T-shirt, complete with a Hello Kitty design holding a machine gun but I digress. We decided to have dinner instead of just drinks and appetizers. I am so glad we did. My friend ordered the chicken, while I ordered a few appetizers, including the tomato, basil and mozzarella salad, bacon-wrapped dates and carpaccio. I paired it with a glass of Cabernet. I love how the server let me taste the Cabernet before pouring me a whole glass. Usually, when I order a glass of wine from other establishments, they give me the house glass if I don't specify which bottle I like. My friend's chicken dish was delicious! I am not a fan of chicken usually since I find it often overcooked. But this chicken was spectacular. It was juicy and succulent inside with a crispy skin. The seasoning of the chicken was quite unique. I tasted a hint of rosemary in there. I wish I had actually ordered that dish since my friend was not willing to give me more than a taste. My apps were excellent as well. The bacon-wrapped dates are the best I've ever had. Before Lavanda, the best I had were at Firefly's in Vegas. I must take my bf here since he's a huge fan of bacon-wrapped dates. The tomato, basil and mozzarella dish was also very well prepared. I love how the tomatoes were cherry tomatoes, instead of your usual heirloom tomatoes. The mozzarella and basil were as fresh as can be. All in all, I love this place. It's quite pricey but it's worth the treat for a special occasion.
Unique menu. Artichoke appetizer is fantastic. Bread pudding dessert is spectacular. Great experience. Very unique, ethnic menu. I'm from the mid-west. I loved this place.
Giving 4 stars but would give 4.5 if I could. An old friend was coming in from Chicago who I hadn't seen 'live' in 17 years although we communicate regularly through blogs, email, etc. We were going to meet for dinner in downtown Palo Alto. At one time in my yuppier days, I knew every place in that area but not now. I perused Yelp listings and narrowed it down to a few. I then opened a Talk thread asking for help and got some excellent suggestions from  Yelper Kristin "Valdeezie" V. and others. I chose Lavanda because I was looking for something that wasn't a steakhouse, wasn't pure Italian and, most importantly, had a great wine list. I checked the reviews and clicked to make a reservation. Upon arriving at 6:15 on a Tuesday night, it wasn't very busy at all but my reservation was in the book and they were expecting us. We were seated immediately and my friend perused the wine list. I was a skosh disappointed he wanted white because I'm a red guy and the selection looked pretty good. Our server was perfect. She was pleasant but not overly chummy. She was warm yet efficient. We had 17 years of music, wine, business and family to catch up on and I appreciated that we were given the space to do so. In fact, when she came for our order and we hadn't even looked at the menu, she said, "That's perfectly fine. The table's yours all night. Take your time." Just the perfect thing to say. They were out of our first wine choice (otherwise, I would have gone 5 stars) but we came up with a Keenan chard to take its place. It was fine and the markup wasn't a gouge. I did ask the server for suggestions and I don't know if was by design but her recommendations were in the price range of the wine they were out of. It's annoying when the recommendation is always the highest price wine on the list. I had a fish dish and my companion had a seafood mixed grill. The food was awesome. We were unrushed and enjoyed some honey lavender ice cream after. I'll be back and I'm hoping I can put up a 5th star at that time.
I've been here twice for work events and both times were good experiences. My first time at Lavanda was for a Christmas lunch.  It had a nice vibe for the holidays.  Our waiter was friendly and pretty patient with our rowdy group, even after 3 bottles of wine.  I ordered the dalmatian beef (pasticada?) off of their specials menu which paired well with our red wine.  The sauce was delicious and not overly rich, and the beef was juicy and cooked just right.  They had a range of other options like seafood, pasta and chicken which all sounded delicious as well.  Although, my one colleague ordered a squid dish wish turned out to be too fishy for her.  She wasn't used to seeing a squid dish that was not in calamari form so she was a little turned off with her food.  So if you're not used to "real" seafood you might want to avoid that dish. My second visit to Lavanda was for dinner.  This time I ordered their steak with veggies and potatoes.  Again, the steak was cooked perfect to order and was juicy and flavorful.  I highly recommend their bruschetta and calamari for appetizers.  They're both well made starters that taste fresh and delicious. I also recommend their creme brulee for dessert.  It has just the right amount of sweetness and burnt crust on the top.  I wouldn't go for their baklava.  It didn't taste freshly made and the whole time I was eating it I kept using the ice cream to wash it down. TIP:  If you come here for the lunch or dinner rush (12 PM or 6 PM) try to come early because it will take a while to find parking.  We came slightly before 12 for lunch so parking wasn't so bad but for dinner we got there right at 6 and it took us at least 20 minutes just to find a spot.
I've wanted to try this place for years, it always looks so swanky on the outside and a lovely place to stop for a glass of wine. I came here with a girl friend to chat and try this place I've been dying to go to.  Upon walking in the foyer/bar is pretty nice but also pretty small.  The hostess was young, polite and looked bright eyed and a little frazzled.  The bar has about 10 seats and 4 TINY tables lined up against the wall.  We took a tiny table and from there the service was just horrible. The waitress wasn't pleasant and gave me attitude when I didn't request a good vokda when ordering my vodka tonic.  That was annoying.  And when we ordered a coffee for my friend and the octopus salad to share - she kept asking if she should split it, but we didn't need it to.  Just weird, not so nice service. Vodka Tonic - tasty, well blended, $8. Her coffee - good coffee, real cream - yum. Octopus Salad - came with potatoes which was odd with fresh octopus, uncooked white onions which didn't really go and kalamata olives!  Such a weird blend and all the flavors just didn't go together.  $13. We waited FOREVER to finally get our servers attention for the bill, which we didn't so I had to ask the doe eyed hostess.  Still waiting longer and with attitude when I got the actual bill we left.  Awful, snooty service.  I realize we didn't spend a fortune there but I was so let down by this place I had so looked forward to. Clean, simple design and super packed on a Wednesday evening.
My cousin and I ended up at this restaurant after searching a while for a good restaurant to eat at while walking down University Ave.  What caught our eyes were the Small Plates.  We ordered a couple of the hot and a couple of the cold and shared a salad.  It was perfect and it pretty much satisified our appetites. Our favorites were the Bufala Mozzarella & tomato as well as the bacon wrapped dates. Overall, excellent food, ambiance and service.
Came here for dinner last night with a couple of friends that I haven't seen for a while and we wanted to talk and catch up. This is a great place to have a little get together where it is quiet enough to talk yet loud enough so that you can't hear your neighbor's conversation. Fried Calamari.............I could have probably placed all of the calamari in the palm of my hand and finished it in one bite. Well............maybe two. The portion on this Calamari is microscopic. The flavor, however, was good. It was also accompanied with fried onions Chicken pate. Nothing special. Came with some whole grain mustard pickled onions and zucchini. Salmon wrapped in grape leaves over couscous. It's good just not something that I would come back for. Halibut............my friend said it was very good but just not filling. peppers stuffed with ground beef over mashed potatoes. Looked interesting. I'll just leave it at that. Our server was extremely nice though. 5 stars for her. She gave us complimentary bacon and dates and it was fantastic.
My wife and I had a romantic evening out and decided to try a restaurant off our "usual" list. We vaguely remembered Lavanda as a nice spot and made reservations. On our arrival, we noted the elegant ambiance. We enjoyed the mood set by the acoustic guitar player in the front room.  And the wine list was excellent, even by the glass. But the food and overall experience was below our expectations. Here's the breakdown: Menu: Extensive and interesting; Entrees from Croatia were featured on the specials menu; A good selection of small plates (i.e. tapas) was a nice touch. Food: Started well with the small plates, one of bacon-wrapped figs (yum) and the other a caprese salad (perfect); My pumpkin soup entree, however, was a disappointment - It tasted more like boiled brown sugar, with almost no detectible pumpkin flavor. Entrees were not much better:  My $20 cevapcici (a Croatian specialty dish) was not very different than a standard $9 koubideh kabob plate from one of my usual Mediterranean lunch haunts.  My wife's mixed seafood grill had great shrimp, but the fish was overcooked and dry, sacrilege for a restaurant of this (supposed) caliber. Service: Our waitress seemed out of her element and somewhat inexperienced. When I asked which red wine by the glass might go best with my dinner, she seemed taken aback by the question. To her credit, she did later recover later and came up with an interesting Serbian wine, which did go pretty well with my Mediterranean-style dish. Dinner over, we quickly scanned the dessert menu, but our phones were telling us the Giants game was still on. We decided to cut our losses and beat a hasty retreat to somewhere we could watch it. That turned out to be a good call.
Was here for a work thing. Pretty cool wine bar and restaurant. Very attentive staff. Hip atmosphere. Okra chips for apps were good. Never thought to serve them this way. Salad was okay, nothing special. Grilled salmon wrapped in grape leaves with raisons and pine nuts served on a bed of pearl couscous inspired me to make this at home. Very nice. I thought they did a wonderful job, logistically with our very big group (60+) and it didn't hurt that the manager was a very tall dark and handsome guy. Would defintely return with friends.
This was a wonderful dining experience for both of us.  The Croatian food was very Delicious. The service was impeccable. We are definitely looking foreword to coming back soon.
We were on the hunt for something to do after dinner in downtown PA, and the live jazz at Lavanda drew us in. Upon stepping into Lavanda, we realized we were a little underdressed. Most of the clientele was dressed in business casual and one of my friends had on jeans, a t-shirt, and sneakers. However, the service was still very gracious and friendly and we were seated at a table near the entrance where the live jazz band was playing. We decided to split a bottle of wine and dessert between the four of us. I knew I wanted a medium-bodied pinot noir and our server suggested the 2004 Demuth Pinot Noir. I really liked the subtlety of the pinot noir but we chose our wine and dessert independently so they didn't pair very well together. http://www.yelp.com/biz_... Speaking of dessert, my friend really really wanted the bread pudding with vanilla creme anglaise so that's what we got. I've never had bread pudding before and honestly, it didn't sound that appealing to me especially after I found out that Lavanda's bread pudding has raisins inside. Our server told us that the bread pudding is actually her personal fave and one of the most popular desserts at Lavanda. After hearing that, I had to give it a try and it turned out to be much better than I expected, raisins and all. http://www.yelp.com/biz_... It's hard to judge Lavanda based just on a bottle of wine and one dessert, but both were solid and good enough to make me want to go back and try their food.
We have been back to Lavanda a few times since our last review....its become one our faves in PA. The service is always consistent, imho, very good, attentive, but leisurely, as the pace is meant to be. Pretend you are in Europe and stop acting like a damn American. :) This Sunday it was completely jammed pack at 7 pm for the Prix Fix. The bar (which for once had space) is very friendly - they gladly offer tastes of something, and when we said we'd share a glass of Pinot while we waited, without asking she was nice enough to split it into two very nice Pinot glasses....mucho points. For $25 the Prix Fix is an amazing amount of quality food...small artichoke starter was yummy. I had the salad with blood orange, fennel and mache - was awesome. Angie had a rich asapargus/something soup that was very good. In an usual night we both had meat, though the halibut was very tempting....the short ribs were good (tad fatty even for short ribs) and the French style Pot roast was yummy. They had had a massive run on the bread pudding and were out :( So we had the flourless chocolate cake.... They also had a good cab for 7/glass 28/bottle. We had a great 4 course meal and wine, and for once, well under $100....bravo Lavanda.
Angie and I had a great dinner here, after 2x rescheduling our Prix Fixe dindin reservations. This... Read more 
HATED this place. We had an early dinner reservation on a Sunday night and was seated promptly next to the window. What attracted us here was the "wine bar", which to our dismay, quite frankly SUCKED. What $100 apparently got us: 3 glasses of mediocre wine Tenne with a rabbit ragu Fettucine with mushrooms in a cream sauce Carpaccio The carpaccio was not good at all, in fact, came with some tempura styled bitter cabbage on top. Our server said it was "really good" -- yea. To someone who had their taste buds burned off. Thanks for the tip, lady. Our pasta dishes came out and I tried the mushroom cream fettucine - good, but nothing to rave about, especially when the portions were DINKY and the prices were NOT. The rabbit tenne was just alright, somewhat tasteless. It needed salt which I hardly ever add but this dish, although sounded really tasty, fell short. What's worse than average food at inflated prices is horrible service. Right away we were approached by a busty, full figured blonde. Although she was pleasant when we ordered, her service went downhill right after.   She came off as a total SNOB, especially when she didn't say a word to us after we ordered. Did she think we wouldn't order that much to up her tip? A couple right behind us was also served by her and she was their best friend all night, talking about puppies and rainbows. Was it just us who got horrible service? Apparently not because the group in front of us had some drama with her. You could hear her snap back in a VERY condescending and impatient way, all the way from our table, basically exchanging a few words with some old man. All in all, I did not enjoy the food and do not know what some of the reviews were raving about. +1 star for having awesome rock salt. +1 star for having an awesome decor. That's pretty much it. Minus points for having a total B as a server. Even more minus points for not having an updated menu on their site!
I have visited Lavanda many times. Recently I stopped by with a friend and had brought a great bottle of wine along to share. It was a special occasion. I was more than happy to pay the $20-$25 corkage fee for bringing in my own bottle. I could be wrong, but I thought that this was allowed in restaurants in California?? After waiting almost 30 minutes for the server to bring the bottle back to the table, the manager appeared with an attitude that was less than professional. He announced to us quite abruptly that they "were in the business to sell wine" and that I couldn't bring in my own bottle. Even though we had a table of food, and were spending plenty of money, he felt compelled to be a raging anus. I was embarassed. I mentioned to him that I had in the past brought in bottles to share with the bartenders, and he acknowleged that fact. None the less, he refused to open the bottle. It was an unfortunate event that obviously spoiled what was going to be a celebration and a fun evening. We didn't finish our food, we just left. Needless to say, I will not be returning. It's one thing to apologize, maybe pull you aside and explain the policy of the restaurant. It is something different to behave like a jackazz and make you feel like you are some sort of wine criminal Shame on you Lavanda. My money will be spent elsewhere.
Great service and good food, but it seems a bit overpriced and more than a wee bit on the pretentious side. Also aren't there seven or eight nearly identical restaurants within about six blocks?  Lavanda, Evvia, Zibbibo, St. Michael's Alley, Spago, etc. are all starting to blend together in my mind.  (Ok, ok, Evvia's Greek and Spago is Wolfgang Puck's, but otherwise?)  I guess if the market supports it, more power to them.
3.5 stars. This is a review by a vegetarian. Lavanda looks nice and is nice and everything is nice... but I had some trouble remembering what I had to eat here. Nothing stands out. Admittedly we didn't have dessert and those all had at least 8 words per name so they must have been good. Appetizers $5 per: marinated olives, decent. Manchengo with quince jelly, my companion really like this. Grilled leeks with romanesco, I really like the romanesco but my companion pointed out that the leeks were a little overblanched or oiled and brought only texture and no taste. Entrees: pasta of the night & the ravioli. Both decent but unremarkable. At a lesser location, you'd expect to pay about half what these dishes cost at ground zero of downtown palo alto. Service was pretty good though the waitress came by and forgot that a wine order was pending. She later redeemed herself by taking only a moment of eye contact to correctly read that we wanted cheese and pepper. With so many other 15-20$ an entree Italian and "continental" restaurants within walking distance, this won't make it back into the cycle for a while.
Came here with my BFF for a nice bday dinner for the both of us.  I'm just going to go straight to the food for this review... We ordered a nice bottle of 2006 Kathryn Kennedy Lateral Red Wine blend (54% merlot, 17% cabernet franc, 17% cabernet sauvignon, 6% petit verdot, and 6% malbec).  ok, not quite sure who thought up this chemistry mixture but it was really good.  we started with 1/2 dozen hog island oysters and an asparagus soup.  the green soup was rich and creamy and packed a lot of flavor, not sure what though, but there was a hint of asparagus.  really good!  for our entrees we both ordered the filet mignon which was cooked perfectly.  it's not the best I've had but it's still good.  the red wine went really well with the filet.  it doesn't take a genius to know red wine goes with red meat.  ;)  finally to end the meal we had the chocolate molten cake.  definitely a good way to finish off our bday dinner!
My Australian friend loves this place so much, she went three nights in a row last time she was here. I was there for drinks on night #2 and dinner on night #3. Great wine and ambiance, especially for Palo Alto. You can sit at the bar for a nice glass of wine and snacks or wonderful sit down dinner.  Mine was a 'catch up with friend' and 'dinner with four', but I think I could do a work dinner, dinner with parents, or date here. Rabbit ragu is wonderful, as is their gnocchi. Brussel sprouts are supposed to be signature but unfortunately they had run out.  Waitress was friendly and helpful with both the wine and food selection (I appreciate honesty and she steered us away from a dish). I've been getting emails for their Sunday $25 4-course prix fixe which I am very excited to go try!
5 stars for the service, which is ALWAYS amazing. I get lunch for the boss to go at least 2x/week (lunch in 15 min? Heck yeah!) & we dine in abt 1x/week. Always lunch, have never had dinner here, but the boss has brought execs here for drinks & always been happy w/ wine & apps. The food is only 4 stars because it's really good, but obviously not the "best ever". Plus, we usually stick to our favorites & I haven't tried everything on the menu. Recommend: Avocado Bruschetta, Shrimp Gambas (if you like garlic), Grilled Fulton Valley Chicken Breast Salad, 'Condiggion' Salad w/ seared tuna, Turkey Breast Club (the butter grilled bun isn't healthy, but is divine), Baked Penne or the lunch special of salmon wrapped in grape leaves w/ golden raisins. Seriously, haven't tried anything else because these are always SOOOOO good!
Not incredibly exciting, wine flights are fun, but I wasn't digging the modern STEMLESS wine glasses, I guess I'm old fashioned in that respect. Small plate -Lamb spare ribs, juicy and delicious, $5 Salad -Caesar, their awesome version, doesn't look like much, but had a wonderful mediterrean twist with feta, cucumbers & red onions, HUGE portion, $8 Pasta -Hankerchiefs w/Rabbit Ragu White Truffle Oil & Parmesan, $18 I might sound like a snob, but if I have pasta, I like freshly grated cheese, the pasta was cooked nicely, but the ragu was TASTELESS, as in I sprinkled SALT on it, I have NEVER done this at ANY restaurant.  We found a bone also, like many others who have ordered this dish. Entrees -Halibut w/brussel sprouts & red potatoes, $24 Not terribly fond of the cream sauce, but it wasn't too heavy.  Brussel sprouts lacked flavor and were too heavily charred.  Fish was alright, needed seasoning. -NY Steak w/potatoes au gratin, $27 Had a HUGE glob of butter on top, good, generous portioning. Warning: Avoid the bread.  It's DRY and yeasty.  BUTTER!?!  Where's the EVOO? The scene is a few decades before my time, but is nice for a quiet meal.  I would stick w/wine flights, small plates & appetizers next time.
will never go here again.  Came here one time for drinks after we had dinner at a nearby restaurant.  We sat at the bar and the bartender put menus down for us, when we told him we were only there for drinks, he gave us the cold shoulder and became very rude and pretty much ignored us. nice impression you made stuck up jerk.
While I wait for Shelley to get ready for her birthday dinner at NoMi (yeah, so excited)... I sit in my party dress and write YELP reviews.  My theme this day is "how few checkins I have at places when in fact I've been there many many more times". LaVanda is one of these places.  Downtown Palo Alto, mere blocks from the PA CalTrain station, its a nice wine bar and mediterranean restaurant with Crotian influences.  Yeah, you read that correctly. Thursday night, left work, went to visit a friend for dinner at LaVanda.  Good scene at the bar, because they have a really decent wine list.  Good Argentinian reds.  My friend B texted me, cuz he saw the online menu (which had not been updated) and basically said "GAH, let's get a glass of wine and split, chick".  When we got there however, the menu in the restaurant had been updated and looked great.  So, we stayed. Seated, picked a Pampa be Banco Argentine Malbec from 2008, spicy, delicious, acidic, tannic, tart, super satisfying red.  Started with marinated olive (meh), baked burrata w/garlic cloves (WOW good) and cumin infused chickpea spread (tasty). After killing half a bottle of red and hailing each other's ears off, we got down to entrees.  Gnocchi for B with sage butter Parmesan and spinach, ricotta ravioli with red sauce for me and basil.  Both fabulous.  Polished off the bottle of red, more talk.  Good night. Very good, attentive service, not overly hovery. Really like this place for a solid experience.
I ate dinner a couple of nights ago at Lavanda and had a great time enjoying my friends and decor, but food and service not so much. We had an early reservation and watched the place fill up around us which I found impressive for a Wendsday night in Palo Alto. We began with the gnocchi with browned butter, sage, and freshly grated parmesan cheese.  It was very flavorful but would have been more so if it was served hot and not lukewarm. My friend selected the wine, Christie, a moderately priced cabernet from the Alexander Valley in Sonoma.  The 2003 turned out to be a good year for them, surprisingly complex with subtle nuances of ripe blackberry and leather.  It was light on the tannin which was something I always favor. Since we all agreed on drinking a cab I selected the Flank Steak with a modified preparation ordered rare plus.  Explaining somewhere between rare and medium rare would be lovely.  *NOTE TO SELF - LAVANDA IS A WINE BAR NOT A STEAKHOUSE* When our entrees arrived I immediately noticed the slices of steak were overcooked.  Not a fan of sending an order back I gave into myself and did. While my friends enjoyed there entrees I enjoyed an intermezzo of raspberry sorbet which was a perfect palate cleanser. When the food runner reappeared the cow was still moving on the plate, but I didn't want to appear a "Goldie locks" and enjoyed as much as I could! We decided to skip their desserts and downgraded to The Cheesecake Factory, which wasn't that bad. Maybe 3 times is the charm for me and Lavanda!
I came here for my friend's birthday and it was just...  bad! For the price you pay, you would expect the food to taste a lot better! The food was very mediocre, I would compare it to food served at Hometown Buffet or something, but triple the price. Keep in mind, since it was a birthday dinner, we had to pitch in to pay for the birthday girl's dinner as well. Besides the expensive dinner and hugo add in tip and tax, they also charged us $8/each for a cake cutting fee without telling us! What is that?! My friend ordered a medium rare steak and it came out extra rare. He then told the waitress that he ordered medium rare and they came out with a very very well-done steak. Luckily for me, I didn't order steak. Whew! DO NOT COME HERE!! THERE ARE PLENTY OF OTHER PLACES ON UNIVERSITY!
So my blind date decides that we are going to meet at Palo Alto which is in the middle of San Jose and San Carlos. It's neutral ground he says later. We book reservations while texting back and forth via OPEN TABLE and one of the few places that come up is Lavanda. We firm up plans and the first thing I do is yelp the restaurant. I leave San Jose an hour prior to our reservation and as soon as I get on 280 I realize it is Memorial Day weekend and everyone and their grandmother has gotten on the freeway. ARGH. I get through traffic and then have to find parking in Downtown Palo Alto (was this restaurant really worth all this effort?). Street Parking on a Friday night in Palo Alto - nonexistent. If you make it to the parking garage near Restoration Hardware, park there; the 2 block walk to Lavanda is short compared to driving in circles for 15 min. Lavanda's interior was clean, modern, and bistro-esque. In the main dinning are there is an impressionist mural of lavender field. The wine bar was well stocked and the wine list reminded me of a small dissertation on the complexities of defining native identities when native people have been disenfranchised from their culture. Methinks that the menu at Lavanda is constantly changing because the linen paper menu that was in front of me was not the same as the one online. So the awkward laughing and giddy school girl laughter started as we choose our pasta dishes and beverages. The "Sportsjacket" aka my date got a full bodied 2006 Arrowood Cabernet Sauvignon ( http://www.arrowoodviney... ). Conversation was going great, service eventually became quite good after a slow start waiting for the Cabernet. At one point I remember thinking that the service was a little too good because they kept pouring our wine and sparking water as well as pulling plates from the table. The food, once it was order, arrived at the table quickly. I had the potato gnocchi with brown sugar butter. I hoped that my date did not hear my audible moans with eat bite I took of the pasta. (Alas, he did hear them. D'oh) Meal was delicious, the warm pear tartlette was divine. The table next to us was going through appetizers like a deck of cards, so it was interesting to see most of the dishes on the menu. There was a fairly large group, and by group I mean about 20-30 people seated in the same section as us. It was a bit surreal to listen to them toast to the exciting times and then to look to the side and see a male couple speaking in German and sipping espresso as though we were in the old east block. All in all the date when great, the food was spectacular and the ambiance was nice. My one gripe was that at one point the great service appeared to be more of a way to rush us off the table as opposed to sincere customer service. So how much did the Sports Jacket drop? It was about 15 per plate of pasta, 8 for the warm pear tartlette, i'm guessing about 5 for the sparkling water, and 65 for the bottle of wine. So it is somewhere in the neighborhood of 130 w/ tip. Was there a 2nd date? Nah, guess I was too giggly school girl and not enough vamp. C'est La Vie right?
The critics are a bit too harsh. The food is better than "mediocre," but not extraordinary. I ordered the veal scallopine - the best dish according to the bartender, and I thought it quite delicious. The WBG selection could use some work and the general wine list is not spectacular. I wen tin on a Saturday and it was fairly lively although certainly an older crowd. Nobody was overly friendly, but the service wasn't as bad as some of the reviews I read (although I sat at the bar). Evvia, around the corner is a similar Mediterranean restaurant with better food and a stronger wine list. The service at both restaurants, however, certainly leave something to be desired.
Very good quality and pricing (keep in mind you are in Palo Alto). Small appetizers can be the star.  I tried two:- * Fried Okra was nice, interesting way to cook it. * Braised lamb ribs, was fantastic, you should absolutely try it. Main dish was huge (I ordered half chicken), so I asked we share it (I came with a friend), staff were nice they split the dish into two.  They even split the salad because we shared the salad as well. I got the menu online but it was an old one, so don't count on it.  I wanted to try the braised rabbit, but the item was not on the menu. Staff is very accommodating, we didn't pay much, because we don't drink alcohol, but I didn't feel uncomfortable at all, and I felt full, I couldn't even order dessert. I highly recommend it.
Small tastes: Mushrooms Cheese with Apples Both were very good. Second plates: Steak Duck The entrees were good, however, because this is a fusion restaurant, our taste buds didn't quite agree with the flavors they used. I believe the duck breast had red wine sauce that was too sweet. It just seemed lik there were too many flavors fighting with each other. Dessert: Chocolate Molten cake w/ cherries This cake was DELICIOUS, gooey on the inside, soft but crisp on the outside. Unfortunately,  they didn't have vanilla bean gelato on the side. The dessert felt naked without it; the gelato would have been 100% satisfying otherwise. I would like to give this place a 3.5. It is a bit pricey for what it is. Good quality food, conflicting flavors, a bit overpriced. We would have rather put the money towards Evvia's.
I planned my office holiday party at this venue for 74 people last night.  The venue is nice and the food was great!  It was the perfect spot for us to have it. All the waiters and staff (with Ann Marie leading them) were really helpful & attentive the entire evening and helped us throw a great party for our colleagues and their spouses. There are only two things that I would say negatively about the entire experience. 1. Parking was very difficult - not that it is surprising for downtown palo alto on a Thursday night especially around holiday times 2. The event manager, Bruce, is not very responsive at all. From the time I was searching for venues all the way to the day of the event, it was almost impossible to get a hold of him or receive a reply to emails/calls.  For a party of our size, I would think that he would be WAY more responsive. How hard is it to call someone back or reply to an email for simple questions (and I didn't need a lot of assistance from him either).  But I expect when I'm about to spend $10k at a venue, that I get a call/email back without having to finalize my event with the gal that answers the phone or send a rude email in order to generate some customer service! Due to the location and our experience there at the dinner, I might be inclined to have a party there again. But due to the crappy assistance when planning the event, I will have to REALLY think long & hard about going through that since customer service is VERY IMPORTANT!! Thank goodness none of my guests experienced that during the evening since the on-site folks were awesome. Oh, and they didn't have red bull - that was a shocker especially for a full bar Bottom line - I would go there again & recommend it to others as well. But if you want to have a party there, be aware that you wont feel like they really want your business or dont have any time for you :(
Ugh.  Had I written this review three years ago after my wedding rehearsal dinner at Lavanda, it would have gotten five stars.  Great food, great wine and the service was incredible. Since then we've been back a gang of times.  Sometimes it was awesome, sometimes just good.  But we were loyal. Slowly, though, that loyalty's worn thin.  For Valentine's Day, we arrived 15 minutes before our reservation and were seated 45 minutes after it.  There were many other couples suffering the same fate, some of whom started bickering with each other and the staff - can you blame them?  To top it off, the bar was packed so you couldn't even get a drink while you waited, unless you apparently knew the owners or something, because certain folks were being BROUGHT glasses of champagne and wine - gratis! - while the rest of us stood there like dickheads, longing for maybe just a glass of frickin' water to quench our thirst.  None was forthcoming. For the V-Day rush they added a BUNCH of tiny little stands disguised as tables, all crammed up against each other.  Romance value = zero.  Depending on which way I leaned, I could have whispered sweet nothings into the ear of no less than three different women.  The food that night was good, though, and almost made up for the fact I had to put the bread basket in my lap to make room when the food came. Even after all that we still decided to come back again.  My loyalty runs deep, yeah?  So Friday night Wifey and I went with my bro's fam after I had received an email from Lavanda announcing that they had Maryland soft shell crabs.  The crabs were good.  Our entrees were just ok, and the dessert was blah.  We got seated, even with reservations, RIGHT next to the ktichen, where we could overhear discussions amongst staff about how quickly they needed to turn the tables over.  Talk about feeling rushed.  I didn't give a shit - I was there to take my time and enjoy my meal, but you should have the sense to not have that conversation right in front of your patrons. We tried the flight of Pinot Noir and the pours were skimpier than a Beyonce outfit.  So much so that we decided we'd just get a cheese plate to go and crack a bottle of Steven Kent '04 Gary's Vineyard Pinot Noir (yum!) when we got home.  Say hello to the final disappointment of the night.  The cheese plate (and I use this term loosely here) consisted of four dice-sized hunks of cheese haphazardly tossed into a box with some brick-hard crostini. What a letdown.  My wife loves this place - it's intimately associated with our wedding.  However, I can't see us coming back.  They've jumped the shark.  They have reached that point where they are popular and busy enough that they become more profitable by sacrificing quality in exchange for speed and lower cost. Lavanda, you guys blew it.  You lost some extremely loyal customers.
Food here is either really good or horrible but service is superb. I tried one of their Mediterranean beef stew dish which cost ~$19 and I would have paid money not to eat it. It came with a few gnocchis that were edible but other than that it was probably one of the worst dishes I have ever tried. The meat was dried and flavorless like it was boiled in water for 20 hours and comparable to cardboard. The menu mentioned there would be mascarpone cheese to top but instead it was a fat piece of butter. I felt like the dude from Man vs. Food, trying to defeat this creature of a dish. I lost; it was so dismal  I had to ask the waitress to take it back. They were nice enough to replace my half eaten dish with a flank steak meal that came with a fantastic corn pudding and roasted tomatoes. The meat was perfectly rare and this dish was complete opposite of the first. At the end of the day, I had a decent meal. Volatile quality but great service.
The first word that comes to mind is: Pretentious.  Unfortunately I lived in New Jersey for two years, and this place smacks of an over-priced Jersey restaurant trying waaay too hard.  I went once and vowed never to return.  Then a group birthday party forced me to go again, and I witnessed not just an exceedingly bad meal but a _large_ bad meal.   This is the kind of place that defines good food by one too many (wrong) ingredients, by the vertical nature of the food, and oh yeah, by the price. If you want to impress yourself or someone else. take a half block walk down the street to Evvia and treat yourself.  Frankly I would rather have a beer and fries at Gordon Biersch.  Or stick long needles in my eyes than endure this travesty of a restaurant.
I am worried about Lavanda's future.  It used to be a great place with a great wine list, but alas... both are in jeopardy.  Dining there last night was a disappointment.  Most dishes we ordered were mediocre... each dish just felt like it was missing something/not completely constructed.  It wasn't bad, but it wasn't good either.  I had high hopes for the rabbit dish, but it was served with a very heavy sauce that overpowered the rabbit.  It wasn't bad, but I would never over it again. The real shame is the wine list which has gone considerably downhill over the past six months.  Lavanda used to be the place to go when you wanted a good California Pinot or red Burgundy... but not anymore.  The first thing you notice is that the wine list has been pared down substantially.  What used to be six pages of CA Pinots are now two... and of those, the first FOUR bottles I ordered were out of stock.  I suspect the restaurant is not doing well and they must be selling down their wine list in order to make up for it.  What a shame.
My veal chop was so delicious and juicy that I didn't want to try my dining companion's dish.  This is only the second time in my life that I have not wanted to share, so is extremely high praise.  I think that the same occurred for my companion.  We both had our eyes closed as we chewed our food in raptures. We did have the gazpacho with lobster claw and knuckle meat.  I didn't care much for it, as I found it had too strong an underpinning of bell peppers. Service was a bit weird.  Perhaps overpriced if I think rationally, but my veal was that good that I thought every bite was totally worth it.
The food 3-4 stars, tasty, well prepared and presented.  We had halibut - cooked perfectly served on a bed of bok choy, steak also cooked just right.  YUMMY.  Save room for dessert, the chocolate lava cake and flourless cake are DELISH.  Good wine list, not as extensive as some places but there are quality wines available. The reason I gave this restaurant such a high rating is great service, very nice ambiance, lively but not over whelming, last but not least, the owner, Luca (sp?).  Friendly, charming and the perfect host.  He made us feel so welcome.  For a great over all dining experience, grab a couple of friends and head to Lavanda.   We will definitely be back!
The food was good, in fact my tagliatelle with bolognese was particularly good, but the wine list could be better and the wines by the glass seem overpriced.  It was quite packed on the Thursday that we went and therefore really L O U D.  Service was also a bit slow. David's right.. there are several similar restaurants in the area and IMO Lavanda doesn't do much to really stand out.  I think it's worth a try once, ... see what you think... UPDATE:  Went here again Monday for their $34 prix fixe promotion.   Eggplant caponata was way too sweet and it said it came with celery hearts but really it was celery sticks, not the small tender hearts.   Dressing on the salad was also too sweet, but the fish stew was tasty.   The wines by the glass list still needs to be expanded.  Overall I've certainly had worse food and service (though our waiter seemed so bored and just wanted to get out of there)...but still nothing that sets Lavanda apart unfortunatly.
Review is just for the bar. Good friendly service, nicely done upscale joint in a great location. Surprised that I have not been here before. 3 glasses of mid level scotch was $47, a little more $$$ than I expected.
The food here is out of this world, but the service is mixed. I ate there last night and to start we had the chanterelle mushrooms over toast, with a fried egg on top. It sounds weird, but it is one of the tastiest things I've ever lobbed past my tonsils. Definitely give it a try. The seared halibut with butternut squash was on special and that was delicious and surprisingly light.  A nice man named Jacques helped us select a wine. The waitress was polite and efficient, no complaints at all about the service last night. Two glasses of wine, small plate, two specials, about $140 total with tip. At a previous visit, the waiter was obnoxious and made the 2 of us feel like rubes for getting  wines by the glass. The steak was delicious but I wanted to beat the waiter with a club before dinner was over. He was incredibly snide, it ruined the meal. So they lost half a star on that visit. I agree with other reviewers that, dollar-for-dollar, there is probably better value outside Lavanda. Another half-star lost. But I come here anyway. Tables are close together, don't come here to tell someone you love them, or that you think you gave them crabs. Great for a business lunch or dinner, especially since you won't be paying. This is a great restaurant to bring another foodie. Reservations are a good idea almost any night.
I was extremely underwhelmed by this restaurant. 1 - Our reservation was at 7:30 and they were not able to seat us until 8:10.  Why bother making a reservation? 2 - The fingerling potatoes with the salmon were SO heavily salted they were unpalatable.  All three people in our party tried them and none of us could eat them.  Somehow they got the full saltiness to soak through the entire potato making it taste like a salt lick.  None of our other food was remarkable.  I got the skirt steak which pre-sliced into medallions, chewy and nothing special in flavor. 3 - They overcharged us for our wine on the bill, and when correcting it rather than apologizing, said that it was actually charged correctly, it was just listed on the menu wrong.  Not my problem!  I know how much the wine I ordered was! 4 - Our waitress barely came to our table a few times, did not smile once, and I had to ask multiple people to send her over so we could get the bill corrected. 5- After all this, they did give us a complimentary glass of muscat, which after 2 bottles of wine, we really did not want.  It would have been nice if they had asked us if we would like a glass of muscat or a desert, or simply taken something off our bill.  But we were not consulted on this. Very disappointing.  Big waste of money.  If you want a nice restaurant, or just good food, or even just good service, go elsewhere.
Like my steak.overpriced and overdone. Went there for a small birthday dinner on a Monday. The service was so so and the food was just barely edible. A $40 dollar steak should be tender and moist.Theirs' was 1/3 gristle and fat. I've had better at Sizzler. They forgot the birthday dessert and my side order. There were maybe 12 people in the entire restaurant and the service just sucked! $300 bucks for 3 people was pretty much a waste. Not much in Palo Alto has impressed me. This just adds to the perception. Look elsewhere. for decent food.
The food here is really more of a three, but the food to price ration lowers it to a 2-star restaurant. A friend of mine owed me dinner and because I don't like him so much (haha!), I wanted to make him take me to a nice place. Really, I was aiming at Evvia, but the trip ended up being so spontaneous, we didn't have the chance to make reservations. And since this guy is impatient, the hour wait was unacceptable, and we went round the corner to Lavanda. Well it was expensive alright, but totally unsatisfying. I ordered a cornish hen or something like that, because that's not something I'll get at home. "Tastes like chicken" was never so apt. But it wasn't even interestingly flavored chicken. Ok, so maybe I'm being harsh like the other people. It's not Lavanda's fault cornish hen tastes like chicken. But it is their fault that their cornish hen tastes boring and costs a lot. Also, I  believe I ordered a tea and it was a bag. I realize this is not the kind of place to order tea, but I had to drive home and didn't just want to drink water or lemonade. My policy is that if you're a nice restaurant, you shouldn't put low quality stuff on your menu period. If it's not something you're interested in, just leave it out.
Just came here for happy hour drinks.  Only thing I noticed were there were wayyyy more men than women (like 50 men to 3 women).  Perhaps it's a south bay thing? This place is so cute & their wine list is exceptional.  Also, the bartender was extremely friendly & knowledgeable about every single wine on the list. If they had a place like this in the city, I would definitely be a regular.
It was good we had made the reservation, the place was packed, even the valet was frantically running to get the cars of the road. The ambiance was excellent. The service was very friendly relaxed. I would highly recommend the daily menu, instead of the standard one, they are more creative in those entrees. the 1.5 inch steak was cooked medium rare the way i like it. It was so good I had to share it, damn. The wine list is great, they had Australian and French flights of wine, great way to taste something new. And of course the deserts, i highly recommend the Chocolate Mousse crunch Cake. I think lot of the Stanford kids ask their parents to throw a party there... there were lot of parents spending big bucks.
We've been to Lavanda a number of times. Very good food. I'd like to be there enjoying another $20 cocktail right now, but instead I'm writing this Yelp review. Why? Lavanda has very good service in almost every respect, but they fall into the same troublesome trap I see from some other restaurants: asking far too soon if I'm finished with my meal. It is simply improper etiquette to take one diner's plate if others in the party are still eating. If one diner is clearly still eating, please DO NOT try to take someone else's plate. Just wait until all diners at the table are through. (The "well we need to turn the table" argument does not hold water when there are plenty of opent tables already.) Hence my comment above -- had we not been rushed I'm sure we would have ordered another round of drinks (which deliver the highest margins of anything in a restaurant). Please understand I enjoy the restaurant. Just please don't rush us out so I can enjoy another drink.
I managed to score this restaurant for a group holiday party one week before the event--it may hae helped that our office is across the street from the place.  Anyway...from the beginning to the end of the process, we were treated. well.  I chose small plates another sides for the group, and I was quite happy with my pasta meal.  very flavorful. Just a minor gripe: we had the room off to the left (a private area) and as people we coming in, there was a sense of void--guests would want drinks, and they ONE waiter came around sporadically, ocassionally getting your order correct.  Also, we brought our own large bottle of champagne for a toast, and they only filed the glasses 1/4 full. The food was great, from what I also heard from my table mates.  We were served cocktails before dinner, wine during dinner, and a champagne toast,  All in all a great night!  I recommend evening meals, but make a reservation!
We went to Lavanda for my birthday, and had a really nice time. The service was great (it was a pretty slow Sunday night), and our waitress was very friendly. For Apps, the Grilled Bacon Wrapped Medjool Dates were amazingly good. The dates just melted in your mouth. We also had a chickpea spread with three tiny pieces of toasted french bread w/ olive oil. Very tasty, but they should have had three times as much toast (we finished it up using the house bread, which was also very good). For the entree, I had the steak with crumbled blue cheese, herb mashed potatoes, roasted garlic (served in a half-clove, so you could spread it on your steak), and roasted cream corn substituted for the spinach. The steak was perfectly done, and the amount of blue cheese was just right (too often, restaurants go overboard). The garlic was awesome too, but the potatoes were nothing special, and the corn was good but not great. My girlfriend had the sardines and pasta dish, which she quite enjoyed. I also had a "flight" of wines; basically small servings of three wines (your choice) for just $12, which seemed like a bargain. The Cabernet Sauvignon was outstanding, but I took a flyer on a Syrah that I didn't care for. The name of the white escapes me, but it was just OK. Still, it's a fun way to try a wide selection (especially if you're in a group).
The only thing that makes me think about giving 2 stars is that the staff is pretty good. But Lavanda looks fancy, and charges fancy, only to have completely blend food. The appetizer were stale and were the best part of the meal. I  do not understand how it can average higher then 2 stars. Looking at other reviews, my best guess is that the chef must've been absent, and I must've been served food that was cooked two days prior. I two will revisit and post an update if Yelpers continue to give it high ratings.
It's interesting because from the exterior, Lavanda looks like a super posh, upscale restaurant. In fact, even on the inside, it looks just so (which makes it a GREAT spot to have a date!). The restaurant positions itself as a mediterranean place, but in looking at the menu, I felt it was more Italian with hints of mediterranean in certain items. They also have a special Croatian menu, which I thought was super interesting! We decided to do dinner tapas style (since there was quite a bit variety) and kept it vegetarian for the night. From the special Croatian menu, we ordered the pumpkin soup and phyllo wrapped with spinach and cheese. The soup was so rich and creamy, with a beautiful presentation. You can never go wrong with phyllo - light, airy, and just plain good! From the regular tapas menu, we ordered the following: bruschetta w/avocado, chickpea pancake, and pita w/yogurt dipping sauce. The bruschetta was really really bland, as the avocado didn't add much flavor - it definitely needed one more component. The chickpea pancake was interesting. It was pretty thick and a heavy consistency, dotted with kalamata olives, which gave it a tangy flavor. I can't say the pancake actually tasted like chickpeas, but it was still good. The pita was just okay. It seemed like slightly overdone fried bread with a simple yogurt dipping sauce. I Overall, the service was very attentive, which was fantastic! Lavanda is a great place to get together with friends to dine. Also great for lighter meals, and tapas style dinners. Each tapas dish was $5, so the prices were very reasonable for a beautiful restaurant ambiance with live jazz playing in the background.
The best part was the appetizers. Then it just goes down hill... Our entrees were so - so. And dessert was pretty bad. I wouldn't go back.
I can't believe Lavanda only has 3.5 stars overall! Admittedly I haven't been there in awhile because it's pricey. Everytime the food is spectacular, the service is impeccable, and the ambience is perfect. Beef carrpacio melted in my mouth. Marinated artichoke hearts were divine. The chocolate lava cake was ridiculously delicious.
I came here for a Thursday night Public Relations Society of America (PRSA) event last week. Was a good mix of people and I would say that this venue was small, though it really wasn't; it's just that the area they have reserved for private parties is miniscule. We were packed like sardines and it made it hard to network with everyone in the room. Once people started leaving it got easier to mingle. The appetizers they provided were great and a wide range of treats from meatballs and mini sandwiches to pita bread with yogurt sauce (I forget the actual name of it). We also enjoyed some of the house red, not sure what it was, but it was alright. If I happened to be hanging out in Palo Alto or someone asked me to recommend a place to go I would probably mention this place, however, if I was asked about having a meeting or private party here I wouldn't do it again unless you're party is eight people or less.
Pretentious. Steak $30 - Overdone and smelled funny. Asked to take it back, but was asked to pay 30 bucks for it. Waiter (found out later was a co-owner) was unprofessional. Food was pretty bland, everyone else either thought the food was so-so or not good. Birthday cake Fee - I know restaurants usually have a cake cutting fee of maybe 10-15 bucks, but this place is ridiculous. We got charged 52 dollars for our own cake.  If only I could be paid 52 bucks to cut a cake and plate them.... All in all, unprofessional, bland, and not worth the money.
Yum!  This place is definitely a splurge for me ($170) for salad, entree, and a $40 bottle of wine) but well worth it.  I ordered the beet salad with truffle viniagrette and goat cheese.  The viniagrette had just the right amount of truffle flavor and was perfect with the soft goat cheese.  My entree was the papardelle with mushrooms and ricotta cheese.  The only complaint was that the dish was a little salty.  My date's flank steak was also overly salted. The wine list is extensive.  Wines by the glass looked a little pricey but there were a lot of reasonable, delcious wines by the bottle. I'd definitely go back for a special occasion.
I have really enjoyed dining in this charming Mediterranean (Italian/Croatian) restaurant with a couple of friends. Everything was great: service, ambiance, but especially (and most importantly) the food! Appetizers were the real star here. We shared four of them: 1- char grilled squid: excellent! it truly reminded me about my past holidays in Croatia and the genuine overdose of grilled fish and seafood I had there; 2- pita bread with an eggplant/paprika chutney : interesting but not earth-shattering; 3- farinata (namely a very typical Italian chickpeas pancake), whose concept was here enhanced with an addition of absolutely delighting olives pate: you, reader, don't miss this one! 4- fried calamari rings : rather ordinary. My main dish consisted of  mixed grilled seafood (albacore tuna, mussels, squid) on a bed of couscous with a green dip sauce (a bit too vinegar-ish in my opinion, not completely suitable for the fish). I loved the "demi cuit" tuna and the squid, but I keep some reserves for the couscous which was a bit bland. One of my dining friends, a Moroccan guy (a more than reliable judge for a couscous), confirmed this sensation of mine. ... And then came the dessert: my panna cotta with lavender flavour and raspberry sauce (I thought the default strawberry sauce would have been too sweet, so I asked the kind waitress to replace it) was a-m-a-z-i-n-g. What a perfect texture and natural milky taste! Those of you who like up-scale Mediterranean restaurants like SF's Kokkari shouldn't miss this Lavanda.
Me and two of my friends went here before going out for drinks on a Friday night. We were all dissapointed in our main dishes. They were overpriced, and frankly not that good! The appaetizers (bacon wrapped dates) were YUM, and the desser was good. The wine was good, but the markup was more than usual. Overall, this was a dissapointing experience. I would consider going here again  for appetizers and a drink, but not for a full meal.
Nice atmosphere and ambiance, they even checked in my coat for me. Not too busy on a Thurs. night in PA I guess. Only thing is that despite my notes saying there's a bday celebration, there was no gesture of the offer of a free dessert, not even a candle on our ordered dessert!  (-1 star on service here) In addition, they were too busy catering to the older, more sophisticatedly dressed clients that it took the waitress forever to come to take our order, no check in on our dishes either. Meanwhile, the bus boys were asking several times to take our almost empty plates away.. ?! food:   ragu beef handmade pasta is very rich and delicious, though a bit on the heavier side. small tapas: - grilled squid, 4 pieces of squid @ $5, grilled to perfection. - chickpea pancake -- this one is too salty! - chocolate lava cake $8 is delicious and hits the right spot, I asked for Lavender Honey ice cream substitute instead of Vanilla, Their homemade lavender honey ice cream is great...  though a bit pricey for $8 for the small lava cake size.
PEI Muscle appetizer was delicious. the recommended braised steak with gnocchi and red sauce was exactly the opposite. The braised meat was super tough, as if it were only in a slow cooker for  2 hours instead of the typical 5-6. The red sauce tasted like it was poured from a generic canned based tomato sauce.  The flavor profile was awful, the rough texture of the meet didn't contrast well with the soft gnocchi, and the sauce was over salted. it was absolutely disgusting. i should have stuck with the new york strip, but the server diverted me to the special.. yuck. everyone else's food was okay, but they didn't rave about it. dont want to come back.
Service was fair. Food was disappointing. Appetizers: Mussels were coated in some soggy bread, arugula salad was flavorless- both the arugula and the dressing. Entrees: my wife had the NY Strip and the quality of the meat was like something you buy at Safeway. Medium rare was cooked way past pink. She even had undercooked and overcooked Brussels Sprouts on the same plate! My pork schnitzel was blah and half the vegetables were undercooked green onions. The wine was nice.
Man, this place sucks.  Food is poor quality, service slow and uninformed and wine list not so good. First: the food is just not that good.  I had the crab cocktail thing (canned shredded crab with ketschup, as far as I could tell) and some overly sweet meat dish. Second: the service was slow and poor.  I asked about things on the menu to the waitress.  She didn't know and had to get a manager.  I'm talking questions like "is there mushroom in the XYZ". Third: wine list sucks.  OK, I know that everyone keeps saying that they have a great wine list, but alas its great if you consider quantity to be the defining factor and not quality.  I asked for a recommendation for an "oaky" chardonnay and after a puzzled minute, the manager suggested something -- it was not oaky.  Later I asked for a "spicy red, perhaps a petite syrah" --- what I got was not.  It's a wine bar for crying out loud. Also, I asked the waitress, she had to clue, but neither did the manager. The ambiance is sort of cramped, bistro feel, but nothing great.  The location is unreal -- you would think that the rent here would force all but the best places out of business. Two final notes: the quality of the experience was poor enough that it's worth a one star....but if you factor in the costs (extremely high)....well, the value is worse than one star, FOR SURE. And the final point: I've been twice.  I know you are wondering if I hated it so much why twice?  Well, because I hated the first time and after a year, I thought, I need to try it again (such a great location and all) ...maybe it was just a bad night...NOPE...consistently bad.  Consider this TWO one star reviews.
Meet the wine maker nights are awesome, I've discovered some great wines that way.  The food is good and I've always been happy with whatever I've ordered, their pasta dishes tend to be especially yummy. My issue with this place is that it's pricey, even for the neighborhood.
2.5 on a good day. Ordered the tapas of mushrooms, calamari, and figs (3 for $12). The duck breast was good, but the pasta was too much. The mussels were ok. I did not like the canolis. They were hard as rocks. Dinner for 2 with half bottle of wine but no tip = $100 I prefer Zibbibo over this.
I came here with my boyfriend and had handkerchief pasta with some sort of meat...which had a bunch of little bones it it. um, gross??  am i missing something?? my companion's food looked good, though.  the wine list looked good, i wish i'd had some!  i wouldn't come back here for food, but maybe for a glass of wine or drinks if i were on university also: i got really good service here
Came here for dinner with my friend on Saturday night.  It was obvious that the economy is having an affect on people dining out... the place was less than 50 percent filled all night.  Despite that, service was very slow (which didn't bother me TOO much, since I hate being rushed.)  The wine was pretty good, even though my server didn't let me taste the first glass i purchased (even though she let me taste the 2nd glass.) the small plates were good.  the server made it sound like they were way too small to just get one (which is definitely not the case).  The cheese and date plate we got was definitely enough for the two of us... the olives were WAY too oily for my taste. I had the artichoke raviolis which were phenomenal.  just ate the leftovers for lunch today :)  One thing i didn't like was the olives on the pasta still had pits in them... even though the server assured me they wouldn't.  good thing i didn't bite into one! Overall its a beautiful spot with great food.  Would come again.
I frequented this place years ago when they first opened, and have been back periodically throughout the past year. Their menu and food is are fairly consistent. However, it appears that the service has deteriorated. Our server seemed annoyed to be serving us and was sarcastic and borderline rude. Nevertheless, I'd still go back for the food. I love their small plates..especially the Salt Cod with peppers. The fish stew is rich and delicious. I loved the combination of Lobster Salad on Fennel..but the lobster was a bit rubbery.
Had dinner here last Saturday with Hue L. & our non-yelper friend.  We were a teeny tiny bit late for our 7:15pm reservation, but it didn't matter.  It wasn't very crowded.  First of all, I like downtown Palo Alto.  It's very cute & quaint. The restaurant itself had a nice ambiance.  Our server was friendly, which is always a plus.  The food was good, but not overly fantastic.  Just average for me.  I can't remember what starters we had, but we split quite a few and then had our own entrees.  I had the pork chop, which is what I rated as just average.  But my dining companions had the handkerchief pasta and the gnocchi and they both loved their dishes.
Me and a few friends wanted a quiet little Fri night for drinks and conversations. We stumbled upon this cute wine bar and ordered a bottle of their cheapest merlot, $32 and the cheese plate. The wine was good and the cheese plate was even better! The cheese plate came with 5 different cheeses and honey. Wished they had fruits with the cheese though! We ordered another bottle, Fritz $40. Wine was good, better than the merlot. What made this place freaking AMAZING is our waiter, Lorenzo. He not only provided us with excellent service, he shared his life stories with us, and was absolutely charming. As we were walking to Nolas, we were down the street and around the corner from Lavanda by now, we hear someone yelling out, "your phone!!!" It was Lorenzo with my friend Ang's phone in hand who have tracked us down, now almost a block away from the restaurant. Talk about going above and beyond! If you come here, ask to be seated in Lorenzo's area, he'll definitely take care of you.
I went to Lavanda last Friday night and was pleasantly surprised! I often think of downtown Palo Alto being a bit stuffy and overpriced, so having a down-to-earth, price is right for the servings, great atmosphere experience is a refreshing treat! I was there with my boyfriend's family for a belated birthday dinner and after several of their "starter" tasting plates (the avacado was AMAZING, as was the eggplant), we moved on to several delicious salads--- the baby greens and the pear/goat cheese. Then a most excellent (to bring in some Bill and Ted's lingo) calamari risotto and of course 4 bottles of wine between the 5 of us. The other diners in my party all felt that their meal was a great portion size for the price and deliciously prepared and presented to boot! Personal recommendations include: the pork chop and the ravioli. All in all a great pick, just be advised parking is a bit tough on a Friday night!
I love places with great service. Great service can often make up for bad food, but of course the food here was delicious as well. The waiters, the manager, and the bussers were all meticulous and friendly in their service to our 11 person table. The pork loin appetizer melted off the bone- amazing. Dates with manchego-- two of my favorite foods! Small portion size (four dates and two slices of manchego) Pasta with Traditional Ragu-- simple yet delicious! Sauce wasn't too heavy, and the pasta was in neat triangle shapes. creme brulee is one of my favorite desserts-- this one was tasty but the slight lavender flavor made me feel like I was eating an air freshener. If I could afford it, I would definitely be back!
I went to this place for a friend's birthday dinner. The food was pretty good. We ordered an octopus salad and also some ravioli. The Pinot Noir wine was pretty good as well. Overall the food was good, but the waitress we had didn't provide the best service. She charged us incorrectly on our tab and also refused to take multiple payments for our bill for some reason.
My husband and I went to this restaurant for dinner last night for the first time and were so pleasantly surprised. There is a special Croatian menu right now and we opted to eat from that menu as well as the regular menu. We started with the grilled sardines (regular menu) and mussels (special menu). The sardines were very good - but those mussels were exceptional. More of them and bigger than we have seen in the past, and the butter-garlic broth they were in was so good we continued to dip our bread long after the mussels were gone. We then went on to share the baby butter lettuce salad, which I think was the one disappointment - super vinegary dressing. The corners of my mouth felt raw after eating that. Next, we split a dish off the special menu - a braised beef with gnocchi and mascarpone - fabulous. In a nutshell - the service is great, the environment comfortable, the food was great (except for that salad which would have been great if the dressing had been a little more Ph balanced), and they split two things - the salad and the main - beautifully and with no extra charge. Also an extensive wine list and many by the glass and half bottles too (which are hard to find). We'll definitely be back.
This restaurant has a very unique menu. Everything seems very fresh. The only awkward experience was when we walked in and told the hostess that we didn't have a reservation. Although the restaurant was fairly bustling there was room for 2. The hostess seemed irritated that we didn't have one and hesitated before she sat us. Tried the zuchini blossoms stuffed with ricotta cheese--- YUM!! I highly recommend. Tried the veal chop with a lemon caper sauce and fingerling potatoes-- very tasty. I will definitely come back for some drinks and small plates.
European, seasonal menu. Delicious small plates and create-yourself wine flights. Super attentive and friendly staff. So nice to find a Croatian restaurant in CA!
We finally tried this place out after many years of walking past it and I have to say that we had a nice time. The staff was very accommodating, even whipped up a mean raspberry gimlet upon request (instead of getting the usual blank stare and a "Uh..what's in that?" response from most establishments). In fact, that alone guarantees a return visit. Shared a couple of small plates and mixed lettuces salad (which tasted so fresh, by the way) and ordered their carbonara dish for myself as the main course. Tasty eats accompanied by great libations and rounded off with dessert (flourless chocolate cake, mixed berries pudding) made for a really nice night out. The only part I regret is not discovering this hidden-in-plain-sight gem sooner.
We had a very memorable experience at Lavanda.  I was able to order flowers for our tables, and they were waiting for us when we arrived.  The Maitre De had held a quite corner table for us, which was perfect for our group. We shared the Roasted Beets, and a simple mixed greed salad which were delish.  Entrees consisted of the baked Halibut, and the Seared Branzino, which was very good.  Our wine accompaniment was the Peter Micheal "Cuvee Indigene," which is one of my favorite wines with a white fish.  We finished our evening with a Peach Crumble. The staff was very accommodating, and took very good care of us.  In all perspective a very memorable evening at Lavanda.
Eh... I tend to write lengthy reviews... I guess I write like I talk - I have a hard time stopping. BUT... I don't have much to say here. Food was mediocre. Service was good - but very scattered - must have been waited on by 6 different people. Wine selection was nice. Bottom line, nothing about the place had the POW! factor. I like a fire lit under my ass... i didn't get that here. sorry.
We had a wonderful experience here last night, where we met two friends for an early date. I will remember Lavanda in the future when coming to Palo Alto. The shining points were the service and the wine. The bartender and our waiter were friendly and attentive without being overbearing; clearly professional and experienced. My girlfriend and I had the same glass of tempranillo which we both enjoyed, and my husband had a special wine flight with a zin, cab, and syrah from the same winery in Lodi. Never  heard of the winery, but I shall now because each was exceptional. The food was delicious too- we shared 3 tapas to start: roasted asparagus and parmesan, risotto fritters, and lamb riblets in brodo. My entree was very nice, a risotto with shrimp and asparagus. Their website lists the same dish but as pappardelle instead of risotto. I was a little disappointed that it was not the pappardelle, but I enjoyed it all the same. My husband's pasta alla carbonara dish was tasty too, and he liked it very much. Our companions had gnocchi and a salmon special. Lavanda has very nice ambience and great service for a nice dinner date. It may not be the best meal of all time but it will be a memorable and enjoyable evening.
Had a great dinner here last Saturday night.  I've passed by this restaurant for years but never gone in -- this was the first time. * APPETIZER: collard greens with black eyed peas and bacon -- really tasty.  I'd have preferred a higher ratio of collard greens, but it was still delicious. * ENTREE: Medium-rare New York steak with artichoke -- The steak was not as rare as I'd like it, but still really juicy and flavorful.  I usually prefer ribeye and prime rib over New York, but this one was really good.  The artichoke side dish thing with crusted bead and cheese was way too salty, so I only had a couple bites of it.  I generally like really salty food, so if I say something is "too salty" you really ought to believe me.  My boyfriend and I both ordered the same entree, and we both share the same opinion on both the steak and the side. * DESSERT: Huckleberry & pear cobbler with ginger ice cream -- Delicious!  My boyfriend was in heaven with the huckleberries and we both really enjoyed the ginger kick in the ice cream. I would definitely come here again, possibly even just to have the dessert.
Solid Four Stars. 1. They have wine tasting available! They have a great selection of many local and international wines. Available by the glass, bottle, or sampler. 2. The food is excellent. Home made gnocci should never be passed up and I was thankful that I didnt. Their fish was very juicy and fresh. 3. The ambiance was very relaxed and the jazz trio brought the place to life with their fine selection of jazz standards. 4. The service was excellent. Overall Lavanda is a great place to enjoy the company of others while chatting over good wine. The menu is not large but not small so it allows a selection of poultry, beef, veggie, or small plates. I enjoyed this place and highly recommend it.
This review is based on the Wine Bar alone... service was friendly and not stuffy in the least... our pourer even let me first sample the wine first before he I committed... then poured the rest of the bottle in my glass and filled it up 3/4 of the way. WOW-ie. Will be back!
I came to Lavanda once for dinner and was very happy with the dish I got, but for their prices, I'd expect a little more.  Every entree on the menu is between $22-$36 dollars and most options are on menus uniformly cheaper. That said, I did enjoy the entree I got and would enjoy seeing if the other dishes can live up to it, though hopefully on an expense lunch.  The guinea hen ($24) was succulent, had a lot of flavor, great skin, and was in a very enjoyable broth on top of swiss chard.  It was also a pretty good amount of meat.  The bread was good, though not that memorable, though the herb butter and sea salt made the bread very addicting.  My dining companion was underwhelmed by his pricier flank steak and a mixed great salad that was just greens with a sprinkle of cheese.
This place is pretty cramped but the service while slow at first perked up after we spoke with our waiter. There was a shift change. The prices were a little high but the servings were pretty generous. I ordered from the prix fixe menu and that kept the prices reasonable. There are plenty of choices from the starter menu so if you like the main courses offered on the short menu, I would recommend it. The cold calamari was good and the flank steak was cooked well too - not overdone, not too rare (I asked for medium rare). Chocolate gelato was so dreamy - 2 scoops! I would go back if I were in the area but would not go out of my way.
The food is wonderful! I will say it again, but when they give you salt and pepper and you don't need it, I know it's going to be good. We had a bunch of items, the procuitto app, lamb spare ribs, rabbit hankercheifs, and the artichoke with gruyere side. Everything was beautifully seasoned and prepared, especially the rabbit, wow was it tasty! I wasn't too fond of the artichoke with gruyere, it looks as if it was an afterthought. They should consider taking it off the menu. We also had the wine pairing from Skylark, which went very well with the dishes we chose. I also have to say it's a great deal at $15, especially when a glass of one of the wines was $17. I highly recommend and the waiter (young German guy) was so fantastic! He was very attentive and not overbearing. Will definitely come back!
I went here for a business meeting and came away totally impressed... I had the turkey club sandwich... which was to dies for! Lots of turkey and melted cheese , avocado and bacon... ... it was pretty huge tho, I couldnt finish all of it. My coworker got the pasta and another got the steak flank. Seemed a little pricey but I think they make up for it with the ambiance. Would love to go back for dinner/drinks.
Lavender Crme Brle ... +1 star for that. I really want to talk to the pastry chef about that one... it really was that good. Oh my god it was that good. I had the flank steak over sliced tomatoes, she had the halibut, our friends had the beef fillet and the lamb, and we of course all ate off of each others plates because hey,  we're not shy! =P Now let me stop here and say that I am not a fan of lamb, in any way. Due mostly to the fact that my mother, while she is actually a really good cook, somehow perfected turning every single lamb chop I ate growing up into some charcoal like blackened brick. Not a fan of lamb. Except this lamb, because this lamb melted like butter. Damn good. Let me give anyone coming here a word of warning though: The wine list is damn intimidating. I spent 5 minutes going over all the reds, and then got to the end, and realized I had only gone through the CALIFORNIA reds, which was a full 1/3 of the book. In fact we spent so much time just dumbfounded by this list, the sommelier came over to help. And then we got carded. That was somewhat ridiculous I thought, so I called him out on it. While I understand they need to be wary of decoys, we're sitting down and working up a $250 bill, give me a break. That, and the table by the kitchen is hella hot. Only reason to doc it down from 5 stars.
I had dinner at Lavanda twice. Each time I ate there I loved it. The waiter was very nice and attentive. I believe his name was Lorenzo. Both times I had the grilled octopus salad as an appetizer and it was phenomenal. As for the main course, I once had the salmon and once had the sea bass. The sea bass was ok, but the salmon was very delicious. They have an extensive wine list and I would suggest to try their wines. I was very impressed with their fine selection. A reservation is best when you want to have dinner on a week-end evening. One time I had dinner on a Friday night and the other on a Saturday night and both nights the place was packed. Therefore, a reservation would really help. Overall, a great place for a nice evening. Fine gourmet food at a reasonable price. I will come back for sure.
I should say that I've been here many times before, and have always had a good experience and great food. I'd say just avoid Lavanda on holidays? In this case it was Valentine's Day, so I'll cut them some slack. There was a special menu that day, so it may be that they had the 'B' team cooking all new food. The carpaccio appetizer was good, but the deep-fried fare heaped on top of it was... well, weird. Greasy on the level of a greasy spoon's onion rings. My salmon was underdone (you'd think I ordered sashimi), so I sent it back asking for it to be done 'just a tad more', and it came back thoroughly overcooked. The wine selection used to be better (or more familiar anyway) as well...
In March of 2007, I had a dinner to remember at Lavanda.  I love their choice of 3-appetizers.  The olives were memorable.  I had a steak for dinner, which melted in my mouth; and had their three-custards for dessert, along w/ a nicely brewed & steamed cappuccino.  The atmosphere is nice, the service is good, and the whole place just feels well run. I recently returned for a lunch in June '07, and didn't have quite the same stellar experience, but it was still a solid meal w/ no real complaints.  It just wasn't as good as the dinner I'd had previously. This is a good restaurant for a romantic dinner, a family dinner, or really, just about any meal for any occasion.  The dress code is somewhere between casual & dressy.  Although, they're not going to kick you out for jeans and sandals. If you're going to Palo Alto, and are looking for a great place to host a fine meal, I highly recommend Lavanda.
Great service, but food not consistant. Huge salad (before entree) and salty polenta appitizer. Without hurting the chef's feelings, we sent the polenta back for saltless and it returned without sauce. Extensive wine list and an eclectic variety of different ethnic comfort foods. The entrees were good, but I don't think I'll return.
Everything here is bland and tasteless.  I had the soup of the day, blah, I had the halibut, double blah - it sat on top of this green mush that was just disgusting.  It here if you're sick and can't taste anything. The only good part was the wine served in fancy wine glasses and dessert - the creme brulee was yum and the chocolate lava cake was decent.  The tables here are too close together so everyone is bumping into each other. This is an OK place, a bit overpriced, but OK at best.  Well, OK enough for two stars, muwahahaha.
I really hate giving restaurants bad reviews.  I'm the type of guy who likes to give places the benefit of the doubt.  But in Lavanda's case, there is no doubt. My lamb was too fatty.  My friend's pasta was boring.  The creme brulee was only average.  That makes 3 strikes in one sitting. With a glass of wine the total came to almost $90.  Ugh.
Horrific! That is the word that comes to mind when I think of this place. We should have known better considering the restaurant was empty on Mother's Day- but we didn't. We ordered some little plates to start and none were anything special that we couldn't have whipped up at home. The other dishes were either bland or off-tasting. One of us ordered the duck con fit. It came out soggy and tasteless. I know, how is this possible? It takes more to impress me than fancy wine glasses and unique wines. I've been to many excellent eateries in my day and have to rank this in the bottom 5%, only to be outdone by a piece of chicken from another restaurant that gave me food poisoning. (I would rant about that restaurant, but it went the way this place should go- into oblivion.)
We went here for lunch last week.  Pretty good.  My pasta with meat sauce was quite good but my huband's fish, while good was super spicy. That would be fine if the menu said - SPICY. But the description of the dish did not say one thing about it being spicy. Overall ok - but not awe inspiring.
I really wanted to like Lavanda - beautiful restaurant, wonderful wine, but food is really just meh. My sole fillet was bland... and with the blood oranges, mushy leeks, and potatoes - it was just an odd combination that didn't taste good or right. The bf's salmon looked okay but it was over a complete mass of artichokes that didn't look all that appealing. The thing that really saves Lavanda is the wine selection here. Our waitress recommended this wonderful Syrah (and I'm normally not a Syrah person) that was super yummy as well as a great crisp Pinot Grigio to finish off the meal. I would come back for the bar and maybe give the food a second chance... perhaps the small plates. Random note - The soap and lotion that they offer has a really overwhelming scent - not offensive but just really STRONG.
The food was okay, but not really impressing considering the price. I had their special - flank steak with fries for $19. Definitely overpriced considering the type of steak and the lack of flavor (meat and seasoning). It was cooked a perfect medium, too bad it lacked flavor. When you go to a restaurant of seemingly higher caliber, you normally wouldn't think twice about asking for condiments like A1 sauce or even ketchup, but honestly my mouth was screaming at me to ask for it. The garlic fries were pretty tasty - crispy outside, yet tender inside. In the end, the price is justifiable if you have good company.
We were a group of 9 people going there on a Sunday night! we all ordered different dishes. every one were pleased with their food. We tried a bit of each others food...i loved that they had live music as well! Try to go there when there is live music! Great place and great food1
I chose this place based on yelp reviews.  It was a decent choice.  Especially if you are needing a date night with your significant other, minus the cute kiddies. Pricey!, waiters are helpful and mildly attentive.  All the food I had was yummy! Had the oysters, salad, really hot shrimp, pheasant, and then dessert. The waiter recommended a nice CA chard with our selections, very tasty.  I guess after cramming down all that yummy food(bad veggies) and wine, dessert was a let down.  Give me Haagen-Daz, which is across the street,  if you can't do better than that.
Bf and I went there for Friday dinner.  He is also a yelper and must have read the reviews below.  He still decided to try. The place was quiet even on a Friday night.  Most customers seemed to be business people.  So it was a little boring   But our waiter's service was actually fantastic. We ordered small plates incl. barrel Aged Feta & Honey, Crispy Chickpeas, Capers & Lemon and Olives We liked the feta cheese and crispy chickpeas the most.  Salad we ordered turned out to be fruit salad which was just OK. We actually were pretty full after small plates and just shared the baked pasta.  Our waiter recommended pasticcio and it turned out to be better than expected.  It was rich, creamy, tasty and perfect for 2 people sharing. After the pasta, we still would like to try the dessert since we were not disappointed by the food so far.  So we ordered Bay Leaf Panna Cotta with Satsuma Mandarins & Vanilla Syrup and it was delicious! Overall, it was a pleasant dinner and we do think this restaurant deserves a higher rating.
Was there last night.  The wine list is extensive, and some really great selections from all over the world.  It even had August West (a small producer here in SF bay area with great wines). The food was great.  The small tapas to start off the meal was excellent.  We had some beets, and a crusted bread, and some breaded fried cheese balls that were all excellent.  For the entree, I had the special of the day roasted lamb that was great.  Tender and done perfectly.  Dessert I had the chocolate ice cream cake.  This was rich and decent.  The price is about right for Palo Alto downtown. I was very happy with the place, and don't understand why the avg is only 3 stars right now.  Oh yeah, the service was great.  Attentive.  Never had an empty water glass.  Only one time did the wine came a bit late.
This review is actually only for the burger, which is what both of us ate the other day for lunch.  The burger was SO sub-par for a nice place like this... our hopes definitely came crashing down... so disappointing  :-( I really hope the other stuff is better, and can justify the prices in this economy. However, it does look like the kind of place that deserves a second chance... so I think I will give it that if I'm in the area (and will NOT order the burger with the bread swimming in garlic butter (wtf??) next time). Service was impeccable.
Wine is FABULOUS.  Just go to drink the wine and forget the food! Food was amazingly disappointing and still fairly expensive.  I ate there with a date and we each ordered from the evening specialties for apps and entree, and all 4 dishes were bad.  Both of us ordered a fish  entre, and each was dry etc. When the restaurant was empty, they seated a couple next to us 6 inches away and the owner proceeded to show them the wine list with his tush in my face when he could have stood on the other side.  Appalling manners and managment. Waiters service was fine.  Problems with mgt somehow not understanding SERVICE.
Lavanda is a wonderful place to go for a glass of wine, a cocktail before dinner, or to eat at the restaurant. It is a classy and sophisticated place (but not stuffy), and attracts the same sorts of people. Personally I like eating at the wine bar, it is more fun that way. Lucca (one of the owners) is entertaining to be around, so if you are dining alone at the wine bar, you will not be feeling so alone.  The wine bar at Lavanda is slightly curved, so you can see the other patrons at the Bar. Lavanda is where I met my husband! The food at Lavanda is excellent, and the wine delicious. It's hard to have a bad experience there! It is one of my favorite places to go in the Bay Area.
Went to Lavanda for lunch with my mother and wife.  My mom tried the soft-shell crab sandwich special with fries.  I had the express meal special - small greens, spaghetti and black bass - and my wife had the express meal with grilled flank steak instead of the fish.  The crab sandwich was delicious with a nice crab flavor complemented by just the right amount of salt.  The fries were light and crispy.  The express meals were not quite to expectations.  The fish was a bit dry and needed a bit more flavor than from the browning from pan frying.  The greens and spaghetti were nice side dishes.  The flank steak was flavorful, but left my wife wishing for more ample portion sizes. The atmosphere is serene with white linen tablecloths, nice natural lighting and a quiet and efficient service staff. Looking back, I would recommend the crab sandwich although at $14 for a sandwich and fries its not for the budget minded.  I'd skip the express meal - it looked nice but I expect a bit more food for a $15 lunch.
I have been eating here for years, and give this place 5 stars for a combination of overall consistency, variety of flavors, and a few particular menu items. Never seen a Veal Chop anywhere else...it is to DIE FOR.  If you like Steaks, you will love this.  The kitchen tends to undercook a little, so if you like Medium Rare, I would probably order Medium.  The beauty of Veal is that it is still tasty and tender even when cooked on the heavier side, so its a foolproof, hearty meal with a unique flare. The Handkerchiefs with Rabbit Ragu is probably the only pasta I will pay for anywhere.  Out of this world, and I typically don't care for meals that are not meat-heavy.  This is a fairly meaty pasta dish with some very unique pasta, clean and well developed flavors, and very satisfying. Like anything, nothing is always perfect, though you can count on the staff to care about your experience, and the owners to value your patronage always.
I met a couple girlfriends at Lavanda earlier this week for dinner. I was there first so I ordered a cocktail at the bar which was well executed by a competent and friendly if somewhat inattentive bartender. One thing I noticed immediately was that the restaurant was full of business men and almost no women. Yay! I may come back for that fact alone. For dinner we had appetizers as well as the lamb shank and the Sea Bass. My favorites were the asparagus soup and the polenta that came with the lamb shank. I thought the sea bass was a little overcooked and they hadn't done a great job de-boning which left me picking little bones out of my mouth at the dinner table which is embarrassing. For a fairly expensive meal, I found it to be average. The other aspect of Lavanda that I wasn't impressed with was the ambiance. It's an odd layout where the front door opens straight to the bar so when you're sitting at a bar stool people are walking right up behind you all the time. It's very distracting. Also it's not a very warm ambiance and the seats by the windows were cold and drafty. I would go back if friends suggested it but I think there are much better options.
When I came here Saturday night after a Stanford football game, and were seated at a table next to the band. With the live music, the atmosphere seemed lively. After being seated, I asked for a cappuccino from the server. Before we could even make ourselves comfortable, a lady (presumably the nighttime manager), asked us to leave for, literally, no reason. It was completely unwarranted; however, we were compliant, got up and left with no argument. Will not return to this place, ever. I hope they aren't this disrespectful to everyone, that is no way to run a business.
I was disappointed with my experience there last friday 4/19 * expensive * small portions * weird service.  our waiter would talk a lot without saying anything.
This place is fabulous. Like others I've walked by it several times and finally decided to go in. Great wine (& broad selection), excellent food. I am very tired of the below average pasta choices in palo alto  (Il Fornia included) -- Lavanda is the exception. The food we ordered was more Tuscan in origin, rustic, and therefore had (OMG!) bones in the meat (we ordered the rabbit/handkerchief pasta dish). The lamb small plate was divine - the lamb fell off the bone (though was a little fatty). My tomato soup was vibrant and savory, my partner's salad very fresh. Service was excellent -- our waiter very entertaining -- but that was just his style and personality. The restaurant was both intimate and relaxing, but I can imagine that it might be more vibrant if you focus on the wine bar scene. I thoroughly enjoyed our experience here. Will definitely be back. If it's consistently like this I may upgrade to 5 stars.
Really enjoyed the atmosphere here and the staff, who were all pretty knowledgeable and helpful. I did find that the collard greens were WAY too salty, but still very good - but everything else was appropriately seasoned.  I saw another reviewer ding the restaurant for serving the wine flights with a measuring spout - I didn't see any issue with that, as you know you're getting what you've paid for. I guess they could class it up a bit by putting markers on the glasses, but having been to many high end restaurants where I could see I was getting half the pour on my flight of wine as the next table. This way, it's all the same. The pours were generous and the wines were all tasty. I had the sardines as an appetizer & expected them to be broiled, so was dismayed when I discovered they were pickled. The pickling definitely did *not* complement the wine (why on earth would a wine bar serve pickled sardines, I don't know...) so I had to finish them and cleanse my palate with bread and water before tasting my flight. Both of our dinners were cooked to perfection! We had the cheese plate for dessert with a couple of nice glasses of port. A fun experience and less salt on the collard greens & non pickled sardines would have brought this up another star for me.
Chef Tiny is the best! On my most recent trip to Lavanda (in August), Tiny sent out the most amazing seasonal appetizers, including a tomato salad and some kind of delicious vegetable chips. The entree and dessert were equally wonderful, with good portions and fair prices. The downside to our visit was our hovering, sour-faced waiter. Maybe he was having a bad night? He wasn't out right rude, just short with us. The dining room is also intimate (aka tight) and it was a challenge not to ease drop on the scheming business men at the next table. Overall, it is a great date restaurant with a great chef and delicious food!
This place has great food and wine.  Very cute atmosphere for business or pleasure. The lamb shanks just fall off the bone for an Appetizer. The T-Bone steak with smashed potatoes is fantastic.  The steak was seasoned and cooked perfectly! We also got the Veal bolognese pasta which was good- probably would try the gnocchi next time. Too full for dessert...
I've eaten here a few times, so I won't bore you with the details of my meals, but the food is usually good, although a little variable. The specials can be great, and sometimes not so great. I love the little plates that you can try and share.  I'm not a big fan of their deserts. The service is friendly and attentive. Interesting range of wines. I'll keep going back.
I've been to this place about 3 years ago and recently went again. I'd definitely recommend this place if you are going on a romantic date. They had live music, the place was clean and pretty and a good choice of fine wine. The staff could have had more experience but it wasn't that bad that I wouldn't come back.
I liked this place.  I really did.  The bartenders were very nice and the patrons of the establishment were very friendly. Bruce, one of the owners, is a gem and he was both charming and gracious.  Luka, the other owner, was hard to figure out.  My friend invited him over at the suggestion of a patron to learn a little bit about the Croatian wines on the menu.  Had he bothered to engage her in conversation, we would likely have dropped another $45-55 on a bottle of wine.  Instead, he stopped talking to her in the middle of their exchange and walked away.  It wasn't that busy in there at that time.  I know that he may have been too busy to chat with her, but it seemed a bit odd to me.  He would have easily doubled what we had already dropped on drinks if he provided some simple and basic guidance.  Plainly, though, the rest of the experience was very good, hence the four-star rating despite this little slip-up.  Not bad.  Not bad at all.
My mom and I had an early reservation (5pm) for Lavanda as we had matinee tickets to the performance at the local theater in Palo Alto. We arrived at the restaurant right at 5 and the doors were still locked so we had to wait out in the cold for a few minutes. When the host finally opened the door we were greeted by the smell of clorox bleach--not a pleasant smell for a place that advertises itself as a wine bar! And speaking of wine, the wine list is a bit obscure--I've worked in the wine industry for nine years and a good portion of the wines on the menu were from producers I'd never heard of. Eclectic might be a better word for the list--there were a few wines from places like Slovenia and Croatia, including a blend of Riesling, Sauvignon Blanc and Chardonnay. Sounds like a strange blend if you ask me, but I didn't try it, so I can't judge. I was pleased to see that you had the option of choosing any three wines on the wines-by-the-glass menu to make a flight for only $15. What is also nice is that if you do opt for a glass of wine, the servers actually come to the table with the bottle, give you a taste and then fill up your glass. I wish all restaurants did this with glass service. For a starter I had the chioggia beet salad, a nice mix of mizuna, chioggia and red beets, roasted pistachios, grapefruit, and goat cheese. The beets could have been cooked a touch longer, but overall it was a really nice salad. My mom had some zucchini fries, which were paper thin and delightfully crispy. The asparagus soup she had as a starter was also quite nice, lightly creamy and with small dices of fresh asparagus. For dinner I ordered the halibut, which was served with cannellini beans, spring onions, and garlic. The halibut had a gorgeous golden sear and was cooked to perfection, but the beans were disappointingly way undercooked, so much so that I had to tell the server (who did not come back to check on us until I was almost done with my meal). Happily she offered to replace the beans with another side, and the spinach that she brought me was braised with shallots and tasted delicious. My mom opted for a pork schnitzel with mushroom marsala sauce. Her dish was an ample proportion, and had a nice crisp texture. The marsala used must have been sweet, not dry, which gave it a little too much of a maple syrup sweetness to it. The schnitzel was served with swiss chard, which was just as delicious as my spinach--the chef definitely has a way with greens! Since we had had Sprinkles cupcakes earlier in the day, we decided not to get dessert, but when I saw Chateau Guiraud Sauternes by the glass on their dessert menu, I had to get a glass. It is one of my favorite Sauternes, and the 2006 vintage Lavanda was pouring did not disappoint. With aromas of brown sugar and honey and a rich unctuous honeyed pear on the palate, it was a gorgeous way to end the evening.
Went here for our 12 year anniversary. Started with a dirty martini:  just the right amount of dirty...and three olives of course. We had been at another restaurant for appetizers, so just ordered small plates: Carpaccio.  WOW!!!  Very nicely shaved pieces with a garlic creme sauce and arugula.  This was my fave of the three. Octopus salad.  Was grilled to perfection, and amazing olive oil.  I made a sandwich with that as the filling.  :) langostines (grilled as well).  They were ok (my husband loved them!), but I just don't think I am a fan of them any way they are cooked. Now for the dessert...three types of custard (flan, creme brulee and one more with pineapple on top).  Sooo creamy and delicious.  It blew away my hubbies creme brulee which I like best! Wait Staff:  We usually sit at a bar when we eat at restaurants (esp when it is the two of us.  I find that we are not as rushed and the service is more attentive).  But I am glad we had the person that we did.  She was very attentive, sweet and even surprised us with a complimentary glass of sparkling muscat to go with the dessert. We will go back, even if it isn't for a special occasion.
I  loved the wine list. I created my own Italian flight to accompany the porcini ravioli. The ravioli was tasty, but I would of loved a little more porcini. Just because it's one of my favorite mushrooms. It's flavor can be overwhelming, so the balance of flavor was good to pair with a number of wines.
Maybe the best service and versatile place in Palo Atlo. You can discover very good boutique wines and the food in fantastic! I have been here many times and so far I have no complaints! The place is comfortable with out being snooty or stuffy! Try the wine flights! Always fun to have apps and wine at the bar as well!
We went here on a Saturday night for a birthday dinner. We had reservations for 7:30, so we were seated quickly. There weren't too many people in here for dinner. That should have been a sign. The food was just alright. For the money we paid, we may as well have gone someplace else. Service was slow. Everything we ordered took a while to come out. My friend ordered the halibut, and it had bones in it. When we asked the waiter if the fish is supposed to have bones in it, he said no, i don't know...i don't think so. He said he would ask the chef, but he never came back with an answer or any kind of resolution. She didn't finish her dish. That, in my opinion, was just bad service. I don't think I'll be going back to this restaurant again.
The appetizers (Fried Calamari & Avocado Bruschetta) were good; the spanish red wine was great; the grilled Branzino was cooked to perfection and was double the portion I expected; the Strawberry Panna Cotta was one of the best Ive had...
We hadZucchini flowers, calamari and pylo dough business.   For our mains, we had beef rolls w/ frites, pork and the guys had stuffed peppers. If your hungry the stuffed peppers are not the way to go. They had excellent service and great live music. I would go back but try different items from the menu.
I've eaten here many times.  I have had some absolutely incredible meals and also some disappointing ones.  This week was disappointing.  The wine flights are always great.  The service this week was not so good.  The small plates were good - beets and okra.  The rabbit ragout was disappointing - the pasta wasn't well drained so it was watery and the sauce was bland.  We also had the veal chop.  I've had this before and thought it was the best i've ever eaten.  Yesterday it was tough and chewy. It's also very loud and warm in the restaurant.
Losing a star is tough. I'm pretty understanding when it comes to fine dining. I appreciate how challenging it is to be consistent. Pleasing the experienced palates of Yelpsters big and small  isn't easy. I have on and off days, too, and nobody rates me! But here's an ultimate test of quality: can you serve good food on a Monday night when there is a party of 20 hungry people waiting? That's a high bar, but if you clear it, you will have a place in my Yelping stratosphere, and I will sing your praises to the sky. Long story short: Monday night, 20 people, and the bar was not cleared. I decided to order outside the usual appetizer-entree box and assembled a meal from 3 small, tapas-style plates ($5), an appetizer ($10), and a desert ($6). I went with a seafood medley of sardines, grilled squid, and Gambas Al Ajillo (shrimp in hot oil, garlic, and lemon) plus some local grilled artichokes with lemon and aioli. Desert was lavender panna cotta with strawberry compote. As I said, we were a party of 20, and while the wine flowed, the food fell flat. The sardines came as four fillets only, not the lovely whole a la plancha variety I recently enjoyed at the Bonny Doon Cellar Door Cafe in Santa Cruz ( http://www.yelp.com/biz/... ). The baby artichokes had no trace of aioli and lacked flavor notes. The squid were tough and cold. The gambas were better, swimming contentedly in olive oil, red pepper flakes, and browned garlic. The desert was excellent, however, and the espresso was fine, esp. since it was nearly 11 PM by the time we left. The wait staff were amazingly patient and accommodating throughout the meal. Did I order the wrong thing? Maybe I should have played it safe and gone with the housemade gnocchi in brown sage butter. Was I asking too much for a slow Monday night in downtown Palo Alto? Perhaps. But I would return and pick something else from the menu. This is still a good choice to dine. It just didn't clear the bar this time, that's all. It was a high bar, to be sure, but not an impossible one.
Lavanda gets my vote for one of the higher-end places to eat in downtown Palo Alto. The smoked trout... Read more 
I ordered a spinach salad to start off with, then had rabbit, which I think was a special.  The salad had a bug in it, but the waitress took care of it right away and gave us free dessert and dessert wine.  The food was good, but the seating area was way too cramped.  I felt like i was in conversation with the table next to me.  But the food was good so I will probably go back again.
Mediocre. Too bad, looked like a good place from the outside. Ordered, pork and was dry. Bread was stale, the side orders of potatoes and vegetables were bland. I would have given it a 3 star, but their price was pretty expensive. Walked out with a $90 dinner for 2 (w/o wine) and was disappointed. Never going back, I wouldn't recommend it.
Amazing service.  Loved the live music at night.  It was fun you can pick your own flights. This place has a full bar too for people like my husband who rather drink scotch.  They have the cutest little paper mat for people that decides to choose their own flights.  Their cheese selection was also great! I'd come back any day anytime!
Bubbles, wine, and food, Oh my!  Fun place, friendly wait folk, the food is fab...also a nice place to start out the evening with a glass of prosecco.
candle light, red wine, tapas plates.  we got the bruschetta, prosciutto-wrapped dates, and grilled artichoke.  no complaints - a foodie's delight. a half-bottle of testarossa's 2007 pinot was on the expensive side for my taste.  but, you don't come here to save money, and you don't just come for the wine.
Overpriced food.  Over priced wine.  I had the fish and it was quite bland and tasteless and I believe it was $30 for that entree.  I'm not exactly sure what type of cuisine this is.  They have this lemonade that seems to be infused in rosemary that is quite refreshing and tasted different, I never had that before, that is the only redeeming part of the meal.
We came here on a Saturday night and really liked the food.  Both the seafood grill and tagliatelle dish were great.  The live jazz band added to the ambiance. Will definitely return.
I normally go to restaurants 3 to 4 times before putting a review, and last week was the fourth time I've been to Lavanda with a friend.  It was another disappointment.  Before dinner we set at the wine bar to have a glass of wine and appetizers. One of the appetizers was overly salty and the other was pretty bland. Neither the bartender nor (I suppose) the manager behind the bar said a word to us except what we'd be ordering.  We moved from the bar to a table to have dinner  and the waitress took 10 minutes to acknowledge us and more than 35 minutes to serve our entrees. As usual the menu was overpriced, nothing great to charge so much for, and what they called "Specials" entrees.  In fact most of their food is pretty bland.  The service needs great improvement, no one came to ask us how was the food and the check came before we asked for desert.  There was a band playing the last two time we've been there, but  both times it was really loud, my friend left the restaurant with a headache since they sat us right next the band. :{
The ambiance is really nice, and the place looks great... but the food is just okay. We ordered the baked penne and the potato gnocchi --- we've had much better pasta in other restaurants.... I could make better penne at home!
A few weeks ago, four of us went late to Lavanda, hungry after a sad but uplifting memorial service. The kitchen was almost closed but our server promised to get us whatever we wanted. We opted for a smorgasbord of salads and appetizers (rather than heavy entrees owing to the late hour), mostly cold ones. We like anything with beets and I like anything with fennel bulb, so we focused on those things. They threw in a variety of greens, beans, and citrus, and we felt like we had eaten cleanly. (I don't recall exactly what the dishes were called.) For wine we chose something on the lighter side (especially for us), a medium red from Portugal. It was full of vibrant fruit and, like the food, felt clean and refreshing. And the price was in the $30s - what a bargain. Tonight I went alone, sat at the bar, and made do with three small plates and a three-wine flight of my design. First the food: The chilled crudo of California sea bass with a gaspacho salsa was milder than I anticipated. The texture of the fish slices matched that of the avocado. Then I had the simple grilled artichokes with house-made aioli. The four quarters could be eaten by fingers and not much aioli was needed to provide a little tang. Frankly, the artichoke alone was fine. Finally, for $6 I had a dish that could have been a meal: grilled beef tongue with fried tripe, a watercress-like green, and mustard vinaigrette. I had never tried tripe before so this seemed like a good opportunity to do so. I love tongue but try to find it anywhere outside of the occasional taqueria or Cuban restaurant. The mustard reminded me of the tongue sandwiches I used to get at delicatessens in Miami, and I really, really enjoyed this dish. I expected the tripe to be thin, but the pieces had some thickness to them and were succulent. (Then again, I like just about anything fried, not that it's good for me.) I had way too much food in these three "small" plates; the artichokes and tongue/tripe would have been enough. For $12 you can now choose any three of the wines by the glass to make up your own flight. I chose a white (from Bosnia Herzegovina), a rose (a Cotes de Ventoux from France), and a red (Rosso di Montalcino from Italy). I was also offered a taste of a vinho verde from Portugal to go with the artichoke (a food reputedly matched by no wine). The Bosnian white went with nothing, the rose fairly well with everything, the red with the artichokes (especially the charred edges from the grill) and the tongue, and the the vinho verde with the fish and artichokes and by itself. The vinho verde had excellent acid and was fresh and crisp. The Bosnian white was fatter and had a strong taste that reminded me of a (non-marine) Muscadet. The Rosso di Montalcino was fairly light in color and made in a traditional European style without exuberant fruit but it fit the meal. In the meantime Lavanda is now offering an unusual wine bargain. On Friday and Saturday nights (no less) you can bring your own wine and pay a corkage fee of $.25. Yes, twenty-five cents (!). Now, as great a bargain as this is, I'm not encouraging you to take unfair advantage of it. So here's my recommendation. Sure, if you haven't been to Lavanda, go once with your own wine and try the food, which I continue to think is outstanding. The next time, when you bring a bottle and pay 25 cents corkage, also order a bottle off the wine list. Lavanda's wine list is full of bargains, surprises, and treasures. You will find gems you never would have known to buy but will love, as has happened to me numerous times there. If you're thinking "But there's only two of us" be not deterred. Bring one and buy one. You don't have to finish all the wine you open; take the rest home. If you're bringing a bottle of aged red, start with a bottle of white off the wine list, or a rose (yes - it's summer - drink rose). Or complement your red with one that provides an opportunity to compare and contrast. That's a really great way to calibrate your tastes.
Tried something new at Lavanda last Thursday night: an all-fish menu. Not only that, but a bottle of... Read more 
Great location and the wine selection is the best around.  I love the cheeses and the desserts.  Bruce and Luca are the best hosts in the bay.
i agree with my husband how this place was nice to us about having our 4.5 month old baby.  this was our FIRST time being at a nice (possibly snobby) restaurant w/ our son.  he was in the stroller mellow most of the time, but he did fuss right before he fell asleep.  we didn't get kicked out, so that's a plus. i loved how they have this $25 prixe fixe dinner on sun nights.  we didn't realize it when we entered the restarant, but it was a pleasant surprise.  i started off w/ the pita & tzazaki sauce as well as a salad, had veal scallopini as my entree, and finished off with apple kuchen for dessert.  the decaf coffee w/ my dessert was freshly brewed and nutty in flavor. the pita was warm and toasty with plenty of tzazaki.  yum!  the sour dough bread was so good that i finished off the tzazaki w/ it.  pretty good amount of tzazaki. the salad was also pretty big for a starter dish.  the radish was a nice warm weather touch.  very cooling. the veal entree was HUGE!  i think this dish itself should've been priced $25.  the cabbage was very tasty and a good balance w/ the protein.  veal was tender. apple kuchen w/ gelato was SO tasty but couldn't finish.  i ate SO much already by then.  let me tell you... absolutely delicious! i'm going to have to return again on another sun night.  great value for such a fancy meal - it's like dine about town w/o the deadline to make it in.
Best Malbec I've had outside of Buenos Aires.
Great wine bar, with a nice selection of drinkables.  The food is also pretty good, but my pasta was a bit stuck together, though I think that's because we were in a large group.  It's likely better if they aren't trying to make 15 things all come out at once.
Amazing wine bar, great upscale place to hang out for drinks. Food is wonderful, though service can depend on the night.
a great place to take silicon valley based clients. This wine bar has good food and one of my favorite wine lists. a great place to entertain for business or to relax on the weekend without fighting traffic to the city.
menu worded perfectly but didn't live up to expectations had the sea bass (grilled) and small plates: zucchini chips (standard), crab cake (nice and meaty), bacon dates (could use better thinner bacon) didn't like the panna cotta dessert, dense and part of it stuck to the plate.
I wish I could give it 2 1/2 stars: 4 stars for the wine list, 1 star for the food. I've always driven by this place on University, and it always seemed so cute and charming.  I finally had a chance to go tonight to meet a friend for some drinks and light bites. The menu offers a good variety of over 10 different small plates, which are great for sharing and snacking on while lingering over wine.  The entrees and salads looked interesting, too, but we were both full from earlier dinners.  Unfortunately, despite the tasty sounding selections, the food turned out to be sub-par.  The chickpea crepe was drenched in oil to the point where it was dripping, and the scattered snow pea pieces in it just didn't mesh with the dish.  It lacked flavor and was a thin, oily cake that we both only barely touched.  The roasted beets were flavorless and even bitter, despite that I added sea salt to it.  The leaves in it were also drenched in the oil that lacked any essence of anything else.  I was very disappointed in these dishes. Maybe we selected the wrong things, but the beets came recommended by the server, and regardless, I don't think a menu nor kitchen should put out dishes like we had, regardless of how late it was. On the other hand, given that it's a wine bar, the wine selection is extensive and pretty impressive.  The list boasts over 35 pages of wines from a wide range of regions, with bottles in a huge range of prices.  There's a bit of something for everyone.  My pinot gris was dry but full bodied enough to go with food, and the riesling wasn't as sweet as I'd hoped, but it was light, and the pour was generous.  My friend really liked her moscato, which was on the dessert wine list. For small plates and wines by the glass, the prices aren't bad.  I know my review isn't exactly representative of the entire experience, given that we didn't order any entrees, but the dishes we ordered didn't make me want to go back for more food.  It's a nice place to catch up with a friend over some wine.  The space is intimate, and it's situated towards the end of University, so parking isn't as crazy.  Service is polite and not overbearing, and the noise level is perfect for conversation without being overly quiet/stuffy. It's a cute place.  As a wine bar, I'd definitely recommend it.  However, even though I didn't get to try the full menu, for food, I can't say the same.
This place is great for a dinner for two or with family for a special occasion. On a Sunday evening the atmosphere was pleasant and warm and the live music made it that much cozier. I ordered the Caprese salad and the Almond Crusted Trout with Fingerling Potatoes and Brussel Sprouts. Yes, so good that I remembered it word-for-word. YUM! Service was promt and friendly. Overall a nice, yet comfortable setting located on a corner of University Ave (one of my favorite streets in the SF Bay).
Mediocre at best, and overpriced.  I can't believe this place stays in business.  It must be the location and venue - it's a beautiful place but when you've said that, you've covered all the high points.  We've been twice now - never again.  Dinner for two with wine was $200. We got the crab cocktail - it was a shredded crab and tomato juice slop.  I got a salad, which featured over-vinegary dressing, and the guinea fowl, which had a really unpleasant too-sweet sauce.  The waitress was nice but very slow, and really uninformed about wine.
I admit there was a lapse in my regular patronage here, but Chef TIny, the new chef has reconverted me.  He uses farm-fresh, mostly local ingredients.  His specials are exciting and there are some really unique items on the menu, which I appreciate.  Right now, I am loving (off the menu, but ask if still in season) his english pea, snow pea salad with red onion, feta and dill.  Also, Farinata which is a chickpea crepe with onion and potato. Excellente. I highly recommend sitting at the bar (on second thought, I shouldn't give all my secrets away;) and trying small plates, the wine tastings on Thursday are usually excellent, bar service is outstanding, and must have bacon wrapped dates with an Oregon Pinot such as Retour or Raptor Ridge.  Chef Tiny has a very good assortment of homemade ice creams.  I like the cocoa nib, but after a filling meal I really like the kumquat (tastes like a 50/50 bar) with yogurt sorbet.  Nice combination.
I went here with four friends on a Saturday night, and I was really disappointed. We were hoping for a nice long meal to get to catch up, but the service was really pushy and the restaurant itself was noisy and felt "busy" rather than lively. After our waitress asked us several times if we were ready to order (we were not), I think she gave up on us and then more or less ignored us for the rest of the night. The food itself was very blah--flavorless, boring, overpriced Mediterranean food. It probably would have been better if they had just gone for old Mediterranean standards rather than trying to be creative. There were several interesting sounding specials on the menu, but they had run out of all of them by the time we sat down (8 p.m. on a Saturday is late for University Avenue I guess?). What we really had high hopes for, was the wine. It is, after all, advertised as a wine bar. The wine list did have some interesting selections--though it was mostly reliable standards you can find elsewhere rather than anything really new or interesting. If you know a lot about wine, you can do pretty well. There doesn't seem to be a sommelier, however, and our waitress didn't really know much about wine. She seemed to have learned a few soundbites about her "favorites," but couldn't really answer questions about the list (which, granted, was long). We shared some Argentinian Torrontes (very interesting) and an Orin Swift that was just decent.
Pretty good place.  A lot of generous food and wine with very friendly staff.    Dishes like quail, fish, pasta, meat.  Wine selection is nice.  I had to give you some props because you have a special place in my heart for being so cool to me and my loved ones here.
I've visited this hot spot twice and had completely different experiences (mostly due to my entree selections). My first experience was with a group of 8. We were seated promptly and service was outstanding. Our waiter was also extremely knowledgeable about the various South American wines. Overall an amazing experience. However, a second visit to treat my friends and recent newly weds revealed their weakness with seafood preparation. My sea bass was littered with bones everywhere. I'll expect a few bones, but untouched there were many projected out of the meat (details that should have been taken care of with tweezers). With every single bite, a bone found its way into my mouth. I hate to nag, but for being one of the most expensive dishes the details matter. Nevertheless, the pasta and small plates were great. I'd definitely recommend this place as an after-work social for wine and tapas. Yay- get seconds! Pork Rillette, Dijon Croutons Lamb Riblets in Brodo Fettuccine with a Veal & Pork Ragu Nay- avoid it like the plague! Chorizo & Clams Grilled Whole Mediterranean Sea Bass 'Branzino' with Tender Greens & Luka's Olive Oil
I've been to Lavanda twice.  The first time the food was supurb, I had two specials, the blood orange salad and a rabbit dish.  They were top class.  the second time however was a bit disappointing, their appetizers are good, but two out of the four mains were overcooked.  It's worth another try though.
Had a wonderful meal here.  Like the decor and the service was outstanding.  We had marinated olives and lamb chops for small plate appetizers...both were delightful.  For my entree I had the pork chop which was cooked perfectly.  My wife had the steak and was very pleased.  Good wine list too.  Considering my aversion to downtown Palo Alto (something about self important rich people tends to turn me off) four starts is quite a review from me. Recommend!
A little pricey but the food was good. The waiters were very nice and the atmospthere is pretty good.
Tiny, the Executive Chef, is one of the most creative chefs around!  He always manages to take something i don't usually eat (like dates) and adds a few touches that taste so good my mouth waters for them!  Plus the menu changes a little bit almost every week so there's always a new dish or variation to try.  I also LOVE the tapas style menu!  Each dish is only $5 so you can share a couple as appetizers or even order 5 or six for a true tapas style dinner.  I love sitting at the bar and having a tapas dinner with a couple glasses of wine!  The waitstaff is very friendly and professional, especially with regulars.  I also recommend coming in for lunch sometime, they do an express lunch that has a small portion of fish or steak, a small portion of pasta, and a small portion of salad.  It's just enough food for a medium lunch, and it's only $15, plus you can be in and out in only 30 minutes! This place has one of the best wine lists in the Bay Area, they've had a high rating from Wine Spectator Magazine 5 years in a row.  They manage to translate this huge wine list that has both depth and breadth into an enjoyable by-the-glass selection.  The wine can get a little pricey but I'm happy to pay for such a great selection, I'm always finding new wines from new places on their list that are great! It's a great restaurant for a date, I would say you can be casual to dressy but it's definitely a fine dining restaurant. One of the best restaurants in the bay area, hands down!
I love Mediterranean food so it's no surprise I wanted to try this place out. They offer lots of small plates but have some good entrees as well. The service we received was very good and our waitress was quite kind. I ordered the Salmon entree, which I enjoyed a lot. The ambiance is a little stuffy, but I do like the overall decor of the place. If you are willing to spend a little more, try this place out.
The foods are good, and  atmosphere is also good. It is quiet and nicely dark. The staffs are always nice and professional. But it is a little bit pricey... Their customers look like more business people, not college students. It is good place for special occasion and business dinner.
Five of us went here for Father's Day. It was also my youngest son's nineteenth birthday. I had lunch here a couple of times and thought the food was excellent although the portions seemed small. But that was last year and I've been getting emails from Lavanda for months since then about their $25 Prix Fixe menu on Sundays. That seems like a real deal. And we were not disappointed! There was a choice of four main courses: Chuck Roast with mashed potatoes which was excellent. Several of us had the grilled fresh Salmon which was pretty good too.  There was a lamb main course and a pasta with Porcini mushrooms. My descriptions don't do them justice. The appetizers and desserts were also excellent and the live singing by Pasquale Esposito was at just the right level to enjoy without killing our conversation. Finally, along with the fixed price menu were two wine specials: 2007 Goss Creek Chardonnay and 2007 Rive Sud Pinot Noir from Limoux, France. Each were $28 and we started with the Chardonnay and finished with the Pinot. I think that's a heck of a deal for dinner and some great wines. We left a good tip for the excellent service too!
My halibut was very dry and the beans that came with it were just okay. My brother had the gnocchi and it was amazing. We went with a large party so I was able to taste many dishes. The dishes are hit or miss, the music was good. Not the best value though.
'Blessed is the man who expects nothing, for he shall never be disappointed' was the ninth beatitude (Alexander Pope) Should've taken the above quote a bit more seriously, but I didn't. I came to this place with high expectations, and I have a lot of reasons.  Blame the presentation - its prime location, its awesome interior visible to passersby, its representation as a 'wine bar' as opposed to a normal restaurant. Everything was decent, yet forgettable.  And that in itself is the single biggest disappointment. Oh well, live and learn.
Ambience is amazing but the food was so-so.
Palo Alto has some delicious restaurants, and this is definitely one of them. We went there on a friday evening and were lucky enough to get a table right away. There was a nice atmosphere, with live jazz music and friendly servers. Good wine menu, with wine from all over. I ordered the baked penne with peas, ricotta and mozzarella. Highly recommended!
My sentiments match most of those below - this place is way over-priced.  I got the soup special - which was butternut squash and was really tasty.  I wanted a pasta dish and based on the menu there were about 4 or 5 that looked really good so I asked the waiter for a suggestion.  I got what he suggested and found it to be utterly bland and tasteless.  It was the thin noodles with artichoke hearts, etc.  The description sounded amazing and I was fairly certain it would transport me back to my Italian vacation a few months ago -- no such luck. The service -- also not that great.  It actually was at the beginning.  But with an 8:00 reservation we somehow managed to be the last diners in our area and the waiters, management, etc. kept walking by - almost lurking - making it clear they were ready for us to leave.  And while I can appreciate the staff wanting to go home, I also think that if you hold yourself out to be a 'fine dining' establishment and charge high prices accordingly - then you don't lurk about while your patrons are finishing up their meal. I don't see myself coming back for food -- ever.  Drinks, probably because the bar area is cool, they have a great wine list and the staff are really quite pleasant.
This place is always packed but I was not impressed with the food. Nice ambiance, friendly service but food was so-so and overpriced. I had the grilled halibut and it was extremely dry. The braised rabbit was not impressive either.
Very presentable and lots of space. I've been to several private wine & cheese parties here. This is a great place for office lunches/dinners and other similar gatherings. I feel the food is not extraordinary for what they charge, but its decent. The hosts & servers are very nice and very accomodating.
On a recent business trip to Palo Alto a group of us wanted to try something that would not only satisfy us but would be a little different.   With a party from all over, including, India, Netherlands, Delaware, Connecticut, Taiwan, Southern California and Missouri that could be a challenge.   One of our members had eaten at Lavanda on a previous trip and he highly recommended it, so off we went.  We had an early reservation and were immediately shown our table upon entering.  The waitress did an excellent job of dealing with all of our egos and accents and helped direct us to some of the items we wanted to try, including making the Cevapcici dish into an appetizer for our table.  The Cevapcici alone will have me returning next time I am in the area.   For dinner I had the Croatian Specialty of Mixed Grill of Meats paired with a Croatian wine called Bibich Riserva.  Being a carnivore at heart, I was in heaven.  The food and the wine went perfectly.  I would recommend it to anyone who also enjoys trying different foods from unusual parts of the world. At the end of the business meeting a few days later, eating at many fine restaurants in the Palo Alto and surrounding area, we all agreed that Lavanda was our favorite, because it had the best service, best food, good wine and an excellent relaxed atmosphere that was the perfect place for friends and colleagues to have robust conversation.
I see a lot of folks saying they experienced superior service at Lavanda.  I wish I could say the same.  I cannot tell you about the wine or the food, because I had none.  Me, my wife, and some of her science companions came here for a drink of wine.  What we got was nothing.  We sat for over twenty minutes and did not even have an acknowledgment.  A simple hello would have helped.  We got up and left the restaurant.  We will not be going back.  First impressions are substantial, and this one was abysmal.
I LOVE LAVANDA! I have been going to this place with my hubby for years. We found it one Saturday afternoon, after a spa appointment. We walked-in, looking pretty slick after our massages, and they were happy to seat us (surprising since we looked like we should have hit a drive through window). They even stayed after lunch hours to continue to serve us. Happy to come back and try it again, we did and brought friends. On more than one occasion, this place has been an afternoon getaway, a dinner to take out of town guests, a place for a special occasion and a great Sunday supper menu with a jazz band for just hubby and I. I always order a small plate or two to start, we split a pasta and we never finish our dinner as the plates are pretty hearty. (love Lavanda leftovers for lunch the next day!). Having read some of the comments above; yes the menu changes. Most places do. And honestly, I like that. I want a chef who is sourcing what he can get in season, and whats fresh from his suppliers. yes the wine list has changed and continues to do so. And so has the climate for big lunches and dinners in this economy. They have paired down their single vineyard offers in lieu of more varietals, at various price points (not all bottles are 50 and up). Ask for a wine flight, and try something new. Bruce and Luka (owners) are usually on hand to offer up suggestions. yes it gets packed and reservations are recommended.  Now, if you have ever been to University Ave on a Saturday night, ummm you know why you need reservations and knowledge of where to find  parking (free parking lots are behind Lavanda, down the street and around the corner). This place has a great bistro feel, great wine list, nice decor, is clean and ideal for a date night . Totally worth a try to decide for yourself!
Have come here twice for the Sunday prix fixe menu, $25.  As others have noted, the menu looks very good... but the disappointments keep rolling in as the courses are delivered. Each dish appears to begin as an interesting idea, such as the potato fritters: they are formed in a tube shape and lightly fried, but they came out oily, extremely salty, and otherwise pretty tasteless.  The French-style pan fried sole had good potential, with a nice selection of accompanying veggies, garnishes, and sauce, but the dish was again a disappointment: the flour coating was a bit more oil-soaked than it should have been, had little flavor (but that's a reasonable choice for sole), and the bed of spinach underneath was overcooked and again extremely salty, and pretty much devoid of other flavors. A pot roast was again "just OK" -- meat was a little bland; the sauce hit me with a strongly sweet/acidic tomato paste flavor and not much else. Soups were fine, nothing extraordinary but nothing wrong.  They were warm and pleasing. Desserts were a mixed bag.  An apple tart was quite good, with good flavors in balance, but the chocolate mousse was overly sweet, without much of a chocolate aroma aside from an initial bitterness, and a consistency reminiscent of bathtub caulk.  I'm serious.  It was just awful.  At the bottom was a strawberry sauce whose strawberry taste was just utterly overwhelmed by sweetness. We shared our plates and tasted four different menus on two separate days, and my take is: the menu "reads" well, but the execution is just a step above Boston Market.  We did not spend any time at the wine bar so maybe we just sort of missed the main point of Lavanda. On the positive side, the service was excellent and for $25 the prix fixe is almost worth the price. I gave Lavanda 3 stars for the $25 prix fixe menu (Sunday dinners); if the regular menu is of the same quality, it would be 2 stars as one can figure $40 - $50 per person for 3-4 courses).  Value is far below other restaurants in the area.
I have to agree with my friend Katie, this place is highly over-priced for what they serve.  I give it 1 star for the drinks, my Prosecco and Merlot were quite good, but the food was totally bland and tasteless for $17.  I had to go home and eat something salty just to feel like I had tasted something that night.  Our friends steak dishes did look good but I didn't have it so I can't definitively say.  As for the service, they did hover to let us know we should be done which I found strange.  Yet they weren't really around much to take our order.  All in all, not a huge fan of Lavanda.
Amazing flank steak. That's all I have to say.
Lovely ambiance and really delicious food.  I dined in a party of 4 on a Monday night.  Our waitress Yessica was attentive and friendly.  Two baskets of bread--the first contained a decent sliced baguette-type bread, but the second contained a warm, slightly sweet, brioche-like bread that was truly outstanding.  Bread was served with butter and a dish of sea salt, but we asked for olive oil and balsamic, and our request was promptly met. Cocktails first (no special cocktail menu, just the standards, done in a typical fashion--decently strong, nothing noteworthy) and then a great bottle of Italian red (a Merlot blend which I cannot recall). Small plates: (1) watermelon-mint-feta salad, which was good for what it was but you really can't go wrong with these ingredients, and this particular iteration didn't bring anything special; (2) charred squid, which was good but slightly oily; (3) lamb spare ribs, which were tasty and fun to eat, and I was surprised by how generous the service was; (4) grilled sardines, which was the standout among the small plates: briny, zippy, perfectly grilled, lovely herb garnish--just delicious. Salads: Here was where Lavanda truly sold me.  We ordered 4, and each salad was better than the next; my party couldn't choose which single salad we would have skipped because they were all so tasty.  While they were priced from $9 to $17, the portion size was very large.  The greens were all extremely fresh.  We ordered: (1) the baby leaf lettuce salad with sunchokes, cherry tomatoes and goat cheese crostini was dressed in a lovely tart vinaigrette -- I'm a sucker for sunchokes so this may have been my favorite; (2) the arugula salad with shaved cheese (pecorino-romano? asiago? I forget) and pine nuts in a warm pancetta vinaigrettte -- the dressing was smoky, complex, slightly sweet, and really made the salad pop -- what a beautiful tangle of greens!; (3) the golden and red beet salad with walnuts, grapefruit, and goat cheese -- delicious, relatively standard but exceedingly well-executed, and the grapefruit was a slightly uncommon touch -- here the portion size was particularly generous -- this was wonderful; (4) the grilled octopus salad with fennel, olives, red onion, and plenty of other ingredients I cannot recall -- probably the most unique, and a wonderfully concentrated contrast of flavors -- rather intense, but the anisey fennel mellowed out the salty olives and the onion -- and the octopus provided a mellow meaty foil to the other sharp flavors -- this was a really well-balanced dish. Entrees: We shared 2 pastas and a mixed meat grill.  The pastas were both fantastic: Gnocchi in brown butter with crispy sage and parmesan (a fairly standard descriptor but this iteration was extremely tasty: the gnocchi were a great blend of melt-in-your-mouth but with just enough chewiness on the tooth to feel satisfying, and the brown butter sauce was subtle and nutty and delicious).  The real knockout was the tagliatelle in nettle pesto with bufala mozzarella and roasted cherry tomatoes.  This dish absolutely rocked.  The pasta was tender and perfect; the nettle sauce was unique and a wonderful departure from a typical basil pest; the melty mild cheese and sweet bites of tomato provided textural and flavor contrast, plus a pretty aesthetic.  The mixed grill was fine but nothing to write home about.  We opted for the fries (fine).  The dish contained various beef and beef-lamb sausages, a pork medallion of some sort, a roasted chicken piece, a small cut of lamb, and perhaps another item or two.  Presentation wasn't fantastic: we weren't clear on which meat was which.  I'm pretty sure I identified the lemon-beef sausage, which was tasty; the chicken was pretty darned juicy and flavorful; the tzatziki in the middle was quite good (though the pita accompanying it was just ok, and the red sauce--some sort of tomato salsa?--was lacking in the flavor department).  If I could do it over I would skip the mixed grill, but then again, it wasn't my choice in the first place and I'm not a big meat person. I can't wait to go back to try more small plates, enjoy the amazing salads, and try another pasta dish.  The timing was ideal: we told our waitress that we would like our dishes to come out slowly so we could savor each course and not feel rushed -- and she perfectly obliged us. Near the bar, there was a growing group of sort of young-to moderately-medium-aged professionals gathering from about 7 PM onwards.  There was also some sort of work event going on in the back of the restaurant, tastefully semi-divided with a folding screen.  I'm jealous -- I'd love to have a work event here to eat the food again!
I went to Lavanda with a girl friend who has good taste in food and I love good food too, and I am an ok cook. First of all, the table they were offering us had only one chair and we asked for another one, the guy brought it and left it right in the middle of the floor, and when I said something, he then understood that it wouldn't be a bad idea to put it in it's proper place. The food and service were both horrible. One of my most aweful dinning experiences. It looked like the whole family was there to pitch in and do the work. Our waiter was rude and impatient. Sometimes I wonder what it takes to stay in business, specially somewhere like University Ave.
For the price and ambiance, I would expect a little more creativity with the menu. A caesar salas consists of a lettuce head, cheese shavings and black pepper. Simpler, unfussy food tends to be better but i also like a surprise kick once in a while.
Really did not enjoy my meal here. I do enjoy the ambiance, but my pasta was very bland and I had a difficult time even trying to finish it. You know you don't like a restaurant when you start to eat the food so you don't waste the money you have to pay for it!
I agree with Tim I; the critics are a bit too harsh.  The food I've had so far here is quite good and tasty.  This is one place I think of going to for their relatively (relative to PA) value-priced lunch specials.  You usually have a protein choice served on delicious wilted spinach, along with a carb (the sauces are more flavorful here than at Bella Luna) and a veggie.  Desserts are pretty good, too (say "Hello!" panna cotta).  Lavanda earns 3.5 stars.
Really nice atmosphere and interesting menu.. but a little too interesting perhaps.. all the dishes were a bit crazy for my taste.. and since they were out of salmon I ordered the halibut which was bland and tasteless.. the bread was dry and not too good either.. however i also tasted the pork chop which was delicious.. and i think theres probably a lot of better dishes on the menu than the one i ordered.. romantic\charming atmosphere so i'll give it 3 stars
3.5 stars would be just right. they currently have a delicious prosciutto with nectarines, plums, and cherries. it was strange though to have the cherries arrive with stems and pits. the quality and freshness of the heirloom tomatoes in the appetizer with cheese was excellent pacific oysters were small and ok service was great and atmosphere is nice. if the plates themselves were upgraded, i think the food would have a classier feel to it. but most important to me is the taste.
I've eaten here twice with the wifey. Once was right after watching the movie "Sideways." We walked out of the theater doors and lookey there: a wine bar! Who could possibly resist that? The second time was last week and and we had a couples glasses of wine, 4 small plates and 2 salads. The service was solid and friendly, it definitely helped their cause. The wine was great; obviously they know what they are doing there. The small plates were basically quite tasty and pretty darn large for $5 "small" plates. The salads were a little disappointing. They had a bunch of great and interesting ingredients, but some how the flavors didn't quite work together. In particular, the octopus and potato salad was a bit too acidic for either of us. We didn't have any entrees this time, but will probably return the next time we are in the mood for some good food and wine!
Wow, what a nice surprise for a whim decision.  Went there for dinner Saturday w/ out besties and what a great choice.  No problem getting a table, great music and a pretty decent wine list.  We had a few of the apps.  Zucchini flowers, calamari and pylo dough business.   For our mains, we had beef rolls w/ frites, pork and the guys had stuffed peppers.  I thought the peppers were yum, alas the boys thought not so much.  For sure I'd go back, great find!
I took charge of a department-sponsored going-away party and decided on Lavanda for drinks/appetizers primarily because I found out they own several paintings by one of my favorite local artists, Stephen Namara. Very cool space on University Ave, and a great wine and small plates list. We went slightly over budget - well who doesn't for goodbye parties - and I was happy to sip my Barbera and gaze at the paintings!
This place was a-okay.  I wouldn't go out of my way to go again, but the food was acceptably tasty for the price, and the ambiance unique, if a bit odd.
I especially love the small plates on the menu (fried chick peas - YUM!).  I also like that the menu is updated often. Excellent service everytime. FABULOUS wine list!
Outstanding food, upscale while keeping a comfortable atmpshere (not stuffy), but very expensive (which is why I've only been here twice).
Eh... not very good. More later.
The food I ordered was interesting. I ordered the handkerchiefs with a rabbit ragu, white truffle oil & parmesan. It had a funny smell to it, but that's probably what rabbit smells like (kind of like how lamb has a very distinctive smell). What stands out most was the dessert. Lavender creme brulee. The lavender wasn't too overpowering to the point where you feel like you're eating hand soap. It was subtle, but you could still sense it. It was perfect, and delicious.
I came here once last December (12/2006) with a friend and we were both horrified by the food. I have rarely experienced such poor offerings in such a fancy looking restaurant. Lack of seasoning rendered everything pretty flavorless and some of it seemed to have come from a can. I am hoping they have improved since then, but, until I see consistently good reviews, I'm not going back.
I ate here Sunday evening with a special male friend of mine. The wait staff here are very welcoming and accommodating. There was a live music ensemble playing soft jazz music, and the place glowed from the candlelight (romantic setting, anyone?). The tables were set up simply with a quaint centerpiece and the tables were spaced out just enough to give you and your party some privacy while conversing. Just from looking at the restaurant, you could tell that you'll have an awesome experience. Lavanda had a special 4 course meal on their menu for $25 that night. You'll get a small taste (appetizer), choice of soup or salad, choice of an entree (3 to choose from: sole, flank steak, and penne pasta), and your choice of a flourless cake or apple strudel (but they ran out of this so they substituted with puff pastries). My date and I ordered one of each so we can get a taste of everything. =) Overall, the food was delicious. Light flavors, not too overpowering on the palate. You could tell the chefs put in some thought while prepping and making the food. My flank steak was a little too salty for my taste, however, so they get minus 1 star for that. Their wine selection was really good. They offer a flight special so you can sample up to 3 wines of your choice for only $12. Overall, if you're looking for a place to take someone to impress, Lavanda is the place to go.
3.5  I remember the food being good, but not super memorable here.  Not my top choice in the University area.
Went here for a banquet last night.  It was pretty good.  The butternut squash and chestnut soup certainly had nice share of cream.  The halibut was very delicate, cooked perfectly... although the heap of beans and tomatoes thrown on top was a bit careless.  The ice cream was good, and so was the chocolate cake.  The side vegetables weren't super special but the starters were.  And the wine selections were great too, although we paid heavily for them.  The service was decent.  Particularly the wine guy.  The bathroom was pretty gross... which seemed strange for a fairly elegant place like that.  I may have taken a few marks away from the food, but that's sort of expected in a banquet/catering scenario.  Well, in my experience anyway.  Overall I thought they did pretty well, and it's a solid four.
I come here for lunch and sometimes dinners. I would say it has an upscale feel but the prices are still reasonable compared to similar restaurants in downtown Palo Alto. I like to try out their Croatian dishes such as Sarma and Cevapcicis. Overall, I can only recommend it.
Food is really good (I had the steak with bleu cheese butter and roasted garlic; the avocado bruschettta is also excellent as an appetizer). Our waitress, natalie, was the best part. Sweet, charming, helpful and not pretentious. The PERFECT waitress. Decor' needs serious updating. The seating and the Lavender mural look like something from the 80's!
I know these people. Good for Tapas and Wine, the bar is cool, ask for Dany. Hes from France and knows his food/ wine. But the food is just ok, blame the chefs and the owners....they need to uplevel the menu and offering. Wine list is not balanced, lacks South American and Spanish wines to a great extent.
Not a good experience . . . all but one dish tasted bland and unsalted . . . really wanted to like this place, but was overall underwhelmed,
I'm not sure why there are mixed reviews since I had the most enjoyable dining experience dining at Lavanda last night.  The food, wine and service were all top notch and I cannot wait to go back again. My boyfriend and I started with nicely shaken Martini and an appetizer of Shrimp Cooked in Very Hot Olive Oil with Garlic, Dried Chili, Parsley & Lemon.  The shrimp was perfectly cooked and it had just enough "heat" not being overwhelming.  We could not stop dunking our bread in the infused oil after the shrimp were gone!  For our main course I had the special of the evening the John Dory in brown butter accompanied with zuccini and onions.  The fish was perfectly cooked and very flavorful.  My boyfriend had the Tagliatelle with Braised Beef, Porcini Mushrooms, Onions, Oregano & Tomato Sauce.  The pasta was al dente and tasted homemade.  The sauce was like being at your favorate Italian Grandma's house on Sunday afternoon.  Very authentic.  Awh the desserts, what can I say...we sampled three ... Vanilla Lavender Crme Brulee, Panna Cotta with rasberries and the Pot a Creme - all were so good I could not decide which one was the best!  Okay, yes, I can, go for the Pot a Creme!  Its too die for! I heard they have jazz on Sundays, so my boyfriend and I are planning a trip back to Lavanda!
the service here was great -- esp since on a sunday in palo alto eferything closes at 9. well everything for food. they served us at 915. go them! they had wine that the owner makes -- which was fab! the small plates were yummy and the vegan mushroom pasta was so good. lourdes loved the local anchovies. and they let us stay late. love them. thanks.
went here with my boyfriend simply because he had a gift certificate here.  we had a couple questions about the menu because who really knows and studies the different types of pasta? (they were much more complicated than linguine and tortellini)...  our waitress seemed confused that we were asking about the menu and had a difficult time explaining them. we ended up getting 2 small plates - a watermelon dish with a reduced red wine sauce and an avocado bruschetta.  with each dish being $5, we were at first surprised, but then realized that it was literally one sauce dish.  the 2 slices of watermelon were tasty, but ridiculous for $5.  the avocado bruschetta was literally sliced avocados on toasted baguettes.  not bad, but i think i was expecting a little more. i got the special pasta of the day, which involved a thin, flat pasta with a sizzled egg on top and my boyfriend got another pasta dish.  mine tasted asian, but it was a bad asian. i'm not too sure how to describe it, but it had asian noodles, a slightly asian sauce, and the fried egg on top? that's something out of a noodle house.  it was good, but the portions were too small for my too big stomach and it cost a lot more than expected as well. the food's not bad, but i'd say don't go here for a full meal.  we had to go get a second dinner/snack at the cheesecake factory down the road after to feel full.
We went in Halloween season. We waited for about 10 minutes and had to literally call a server to take our order. I picked the Pumpkin Gnocchi which was abysmal. However, the Croatian Lamb and Beef sausage was great. The Lavender panna cotta was heavenly and is a must have..@
I just went here last Saturday and I'm afraid that based on service and the food, I have to drop my rating to 3 stars.  Anyway,  I ordered from their pri fixe (which was a great value at 25 dollars)  The meal starts off with the still awesome fried zucchini chips. You then get a choice of salad or soup and then a choice of fish, osso bucco and I believe a chicken dish. Dessert is sorbet or the chocolate cake. I knew right off the bat that things were going to go slightly awry when we got the bread basked. The 1st time I went there, the bread basket had this really good, crispy bread. This time around, that bread was not part of the bread basket.  "Ok, no worries" I figured the restaurant just got a different supply of bread for the week.  We then waited for what seemed like an eternity to get our drink and food order.  Service really seemed slow and lackluster considering that we came in early (around 6-6:30PM) and that the restaurant wasn't full yet.  All through the evening, I continually had to flag down the waiter whether it was for refills, bread, fresh ground pepper (this should always be offered at the start of each course by the way) etc.. To summarize, he just didn't have a good beside manner. As for my entree, my friend ordered the fish (which she enjoyed enough) and I  ordered the osso bucco.  The osso bucco was stringy,  had a lot of cartilage/flap, and not very tender.  The sauce on top wasn't very flavorful either.  The polenta that came with the dish was also bland. For dessert, we both had the chocolate cake and we both agreed it was "meh." All in all, the whole evening from the server to the food was just "meh." Maybe if I get the same dish I had the 1st time (the rabbit pasta) and the same server, maybe I can replicate the wonderful experience I had the first time.
I just want to say that the food here was top notch and very reasonable, given the location and... Read more 
this is a great place for a night out. the food is really good, but I would not go there for the food, as this is not the best food I ever had. It's just a nice place to hag out with someone you love. very nice..
Good first date place, as it's pretty nice and neutral.  The lamb and rabbit are both delicious and I'd recommend them.  Nothing earth-shattering though.
I recently went to lunch with colleagues from work at Lavanda and was majorly disappointed.  The main dinning room is cramped and awkward.  The food is expensive and frankly it wasn't very good either.  I ordered a medium rare rib eye steak which came burned on the outside and raw in the center.  What made the situation worse was that the waitress paid so little attention to us that by the time I got her attention to let her know that my steak was too rare, everyone else was nearly finished.  Adding insult to injury and despite the terrible service that we received, Lavanda added a 20% gratuity to our party of 5.  Maybe I'm out of touch but aren't mandatory gratuities for large parties?  Maybe the evening dinning experience is better, but with so many interesting places to eat in Palo Alto, I won't ever go back to Lavanda to find out.
Took my grandma to dinner here and it started off poorly- with every table open, seated way in the back of the restaurant. Waiters forgot about us, then forgot about the drinks. The menu was not exciting, and the food turned out to be the same- not exciting, lacking flavor and definitely not worth the price. The one word to describe this place is "pretentious."  Don't waste your money here,  there are plenty of far superior Italian restaurants in Palo Alto.
Sad Dining Experience.      Decor - stale and out dated.     Ambiance - think Denny's restaurant with an illegal face lift.     Service - no one cared.     The wait staff - I think those were Zynga Cafe World avatars....   The two bartenders were just drinking wine behind the bar and laughing.      The hostess was sweet, poor thing was trying... Lavanda's website reeled us in: "Lavanda Restaurant and Wine Bar presents award-winning Mediterranean Italian cuisine and wines in downtown Palo Alto. Recognized by Michelin Guide's inaugural guide for San Francisco as one of the best restaurants in the Bay area. " Won awards?? Recognized by Michelin Guide? We were first served Crispy Zucchini Chips - Pitiful.  Next, Sardines alla Plancha with Salsa Verde - Not a drop of Salsa Verde!  Just 5 sardines on a plate. I shook my head... Salad: honestly, greens right out of a Trader Joes salad bag; sprinkled with salt, pepper, oil and apple cider vinegar.  So sad... Then the soup: imagine the beginnings of a cream soup: oil, flour and a liquid (not a stock). That was the soup. Gross!   The entrees ~~ they were so bad I honestly cannot remember.... The wine - are you serious? Over all - Bland, Boring, I was Bewildered....
Was here for dinner the other night. Was disappointed and sorry I had recommended we go here instead of Evvia. Had the grilled sea bass. The fish wasnt particularly high quality and since it was just grilled with EVO I would expect better for $32. The spinach that came with the entree was over-salted. And then the dessert (Lavanda panna cotta) was so tasteless that I only ate a spoonful. Great for my diet. So all in all, it gets 1 star for location / decor.
Despite it's reputation as Mediterranean / Italian, I would classify the cuisine as Californian, emphasizing quality seasonal ingredients in thoughtful combinations. The burger had a great blue-cheese flavor. The environment is not too romantic for a business lunch.
The food was inventive and very good. The wine list was good, but a little pricey. We were there on a night with live jazz which was also quite good and not too loud.
Hmmm....this was an interesting one. They have a nice wine selection, including dessert wines, and know the wine they serve. That part was nice. The food was...intriguing...not spectacular in my opinion. The chef seemed to aim for bringing out the natural, simple flavors of the foods, but this meant that most of the foods were not incredibly flavorful or fascinating. If you tend to enjoy more delicate, pure flavors you may really enjoy this restaurant, but if you want more flavor and more creativity, this may not be for you. The environment was pleasant, and the desserts were nice, especially the flourless chocolate cake with a vintage port.
One of the best restaurants in Palo Alto.  Food is wonderful.  New chef who is changing up the menu.  Everything is delicious.  Great wine list as well.  Ask for Jacque, the Sommelier, he'll pick a magnificent wine to complement your meal.  I've dined here many times and the people (Bruce, Luca, BJ, Jacque) all make me feel like family.  Sunday nights are now a good time to come in for Prix Fix menu.    You'll love it.
Very nice place, food a bit upscale and good use of less common dishes like rabbit.  The mussels were very good, and service was excellent.
Service was fantastic and the cool thing is there was live jazz music.  Bad thing was it's for an older audience.  I went with girlfriends and felt like I should've been there with my grandparents.  I had the special, beef cheeks with risotto, the cheeks were okay (a bit too rich) and the risotto was terrible, it was made with like heavy whipping cream that just made it like a bad tapico, it was also way too al dente.  I would go back again, but not my first choice.
I've now been to Lavanda several times for lunch.   It's a laid-back place at that hour -- good place to have a fairly quiet and subdued meal and talk business. The service is a bit slow, but the waitstaff compensates for that by being friendly.  Good selection of menu items, and most items are solid -- not melt-in-your-mouth-delicious, but certainly solid, and good value for the money.  I'm a huge fan of their Spinach Fulton Salad and Croque au Monsieur. Lavanda would probably be a standby for me as far as business lunches go, especially when I am looking for proximity, and a good  option.
I really like the open and classic design style of this restaurant.  It's both cold and warm all at the same time with an up and coming romantic feel to it.  If you're looking for a place to have a nice glass of wine while you sit in a tall dark wood chair at a non-invasive bar, then this is your jam.
The short version: I don't seek this place out, but I never mind coming. I wish they had a bit more in the way of simple menu options--it's not the best place to take picky eaters, or groups with different tastes. But what everything I've had so far on the menu has been excellent. The service has been decent, although unremarkable. The only downside I've run into is that it's been loud on a few occasions, although I don't think that's the typical state of affairs. However, there's nothing that really makes them stand out.
The food here has been reliably delicious, all of it, since they opened, can't believe it's ten years ago.  Never had anything bad, never had anything but a good time.  Now that that's out of the way, pay attention to Luka, who is a stellar kind of a restaurateur.  He even greets you if he runs across you in a different town.  And the other wait staff have stories to tell about their lives in Croatia, or gossip about other restaurants they remember serving you at --- OK it doesn't have to be chatty, they will let you alone and be civilized and professional if that's what's you want, or if you are having fabulous fun with your friends, which you will be.  Tonight we had Short ribs on polenta, Croatian sausages, salmon wrapped in grape leaves, gnocchi, beet salad, and a pear tarte.  Sorry we only had room for one dessert.  If this isn't making you hungry you must have just come from there.  most important: Luka is the new father of Rocco so give him a big congratulations when you see him at his restaurant to catch some peace.
The food is expensive and frankly it wasn't very good either.  I ordered a medium rare rib eye steak which came burned on the outside and raw in the center.  What made the situation worse was that the waitress paid so little attention to us that by the time I got her attention to let her know that my steak was too rare, everyone else was nearly finished.  Adding insult to injury and despite the terrible service that we received, Maybe the evening dinning experience is better, but with so many interesting places to eat in Palo Alto, I won't ever go back to Lavanda to find out.
Dined at Lavanda last night.  My friend and I were asked if we would like sparkling water or something else.  We both said we preferred flat water.  They brought us a bottle and charged us $7 for it...we never asked for bottled water...I guess we should have said "tap" water.  Both of us ordered a glass of chardonnay and the pour was so small I thought it was a joke.  I questioned our server and she said that the "bowl" glasses they serve chardonnay in can hold an entire bottle of wine and that is why the amount seemed so small.  We each finished our glasses in a few sips.  I seriously doubt the glass could hold a whole bottle!  The food was excellent.  Service became sporadic as restaurant became more crowded.  We were so disappointed by the wine and water charge that the good food was forgotten about.
Ajvar (red pepper + eggplant) appetizer was excellent. Service very good. However, the menu is decidedly not vegan friendly.  I ordered the Tagliarini pesto without the mozzarella, and it was like ramen in an odd brown sauce.  The pesto lacked a basil quality. The server noticed I wasn't eating and kindly offered a swap. I declined, and she took it off the tab on her own accord. Very kind. My wife loved the salmon. The choose-your-own wine flight was a treat; the Croatian zin was tasty, if you like zinfandel.
Always good service, and the food has gotten better over the years (change in chef),  I am more of a fan of their cold appetizers and entrees than their hot appetizers though.
oh man. just this location. great presentation, yum on the proscuitto and melon, and ohh the steak i got was so tasty! it came with tomatoes and it complemented it soo well. the pasta was also great, but not as orgasmic as the steak. do it, eat here if you can.
This place is great. The food is always good, and the wine list is superb. Great for taking clients, friends, whoever.
as soon as i finished my dinner at lavanda, i knew i would write them a 5.star yelp.  just now, i saw that my friend ede gave them the 1.star spite yelp back in 2008.  wow!  it sounds like she had good reason to; but gee, maybe the place as simply gotten a lot better since then?  i'm going to stand by my 5.stars, and i don't give out 5 stars to restaurants all that often. my wife, my son, and i went to stanfurd mall earlier that day to pick up a wedding present off my friend's registry at bloomingdales.  i told my wife that i honestly kind of secretly missed hanging out at malls.  back when i was an unemployed grad student, i used manage to hang out at the mall more; but nowadays, i'm so busy; no time to be a mallrat.  thus, my wife suggested we hang out at stanfurd mall after buying the gift.  eh!  what the heck is so great about stanfurd mall?!  it reminded me of when i used to work at a startup in corte madera near that corte madera mall.  there just aren't really any useful stores at these snooty, outdoor malls.   i would much rather be at valley fair. okay, now that i've established myself as bourgeois, silicon valley.raised plebe (i too question the validity of the term "bourgeois plebe," but a google search has verified it moderately used/misused); please allow me to continue to expound my 5.star yelp.   well, i knew it had been a long time since my wife and i got to enjoy a really nice dinner at a really nice restaurant.  we had found a parking spot on uni in front of http://booyah.com , across the street from http://milo.com .  while my wife fed my son in the car, i spotted lavanda across the street and quickly made the http://opentable.com reservation.  i was nervous about bringing a 4 month old into this kind of restaurant; but my wife wasn't going to let that stop us.  the staff was pretty cool about our having a baby with us.  they found us a good table in the back, so we wouldn't be too distracting if anything happened, nawhaddahmshayin'?  the ambience was not ideal for a baby but was ideal for a romantic date spot: not too noisy; nice, soft music; classy decor, etc.  i'm used to being place with lots of ambient chatter that will help my baby fall asleep.  when the ambient sound is very quiet with occasional clings and dings of silverware on china and wine glasses on tables; that's not all that great for keeping a baby calm.  i was really nervous that about how all these snooty stanfurd types would react to baby sounds.  i looked around and saw empty nesters and "dual income no kid (dink) types and feared how overheard conversation would soon steer toward explanations of why breeding is for losers and how overpopulation is killing the environment.  as soon as my wife put a blanket on my son, he fell asleep.  phew! well, my wife and i were pleasantly surprised by the $25 prix fixe menu.  wow!  what a great deal!  maybe this only happens on sunday nights?  if so, it's like a weekly "dine about town!"   i highly suggest taking advantage of this deal and exploiting it to death.  on that night, the menu was: 1. appetizer: tzatziki with pita 2. first course: asparagus soup or mixed greens salad 3. second course: veal with fried artichokes or salmon with fingerling potatoes 4. dessert: apple kuchen or flourless chococake. we pretty much took one of each, and everything was great!  we were very full at the end and couldn't finish our rich desserts.  the decaf coffee was nice a rich and went well with those sweet indulgences. throughout the night, the service was very attentive and polite.  we managed to survive our first attempt at bringing a baby to a nice restaurant.  phew!
only been here once, but they had good food and a nice wine selection.
If you know me, you know I hate giving a place 3 stars.  I LOVED my food and the wine we picked was phenomenal!  But I felt like our waiter HATED us...maybe cause we were there for the "Dine Downtown Palo Alto"? (Pre Fixe meals they have every Monday in August.)  I don't know if I'd spend too much moolah here if it weren't for the $34 four course meal we had.  Maybe I'm projecting, but I felt like they didn't like me in their establishment.  They send me weekly e-mails telling me "come visit" but I felt totally unwelcome the second I walked in the door.  But our waiter made me feel like I was imposing when I asked him to close a window as I was freezing in my dress...and when I asked him to put our white wine bottle in the fridge cause it was getting room temp.  Did I run over his cat or something?  I think they would have liked me better if I was Atherton elite with millions to throw down on dinner...but in all honesty, I am just a lowly grad student, looking for a nice meal with the bf.
Visited Lavanda for lunch w/ a colleague.  Great service, food and ambiance.  Good variety in the menu.  I would go again.
First time at Lavanda. The atmosphere is impressive. The menu seems European and Mediterranean with many interesting options.of vegetables and meats. Nice wine list. OK pricing. We will be back
the prices seem too high for the quality
Abstract: Lavanda is a quality restaurant with tasty food that provides a good atmosphere for a date and meeting people, but not for a serious food lover. Service is decent, but slow. Prices are high for the quality. Food: Lavanda does not excel in any one area, but its high point is the quality of its ingredients. I started out with romaine lettuce hearts with creamy anchovy dressing. The dressing is home made, and very complex--you can taste the anchovy and cream and egg almost separately. The romaine hearts all had even distribution of the dressing, topped with additional chopped vegetables in a similar dressing. Every leaf was crisp and cut well with a knife and fork. My main course of john dory was meaty, basted in butter, and served over artichokes. I had requested a rare fish, but mine was cooked medium-well, definitely a bit too dry, though it was still a quality filet. The artichokes, however, were so tough that it was almost inedible, requiring 10 minutes of chewing to swallow without choking. Both desserts we ordered were very rich, one being the chocolate mousse and the other being a bread pudding served in dematisse coffee mug.  The chocolate mousse was creamy, topped with crunchy chocolate pieces and rested on a thick, fudgey base. Chocolate sauce was drizzled around and on the plate. I was never a huge fan of bread pudding, and Lavanda's is not much different from home made bread pudding you can make yourself. It comes topped with a scoop of ice cream. Wines by the glass are poured generously, and we were even given a free glass of Sauternes for dessert. Service: The service was remarkably slow, but it was a Friday evening when we ate there. The waiters were professional and not overly chatty, offering advice and information on food without sounding like car salesmen. Wines are a different story, as our waiter recommended a cabernet sauvignon with the john dory we ordered, which would have overpowered the delicate tones in the fish. We instead went with a pinot noir, which paired much more nicely with the john dory. Overall, it was a decent experience, but the price was a bit high for what we got in terms of food and service. The bar area provides better ambiance, and the service is faster. Nonetheless, the lighting is well done, and the restaurant is very clean, and would be a nice atmosphere for a serious date.
I made reservations well over a week ahead of time for 3 of us on a Friday night.  Traffic and parking on a Friday night in downtown Palo Alto are horrendous, but I figured it would all be worth it once we sat down for dinner ( and we were all so hungry! )  I checked in at 8 pm, and we waited and waited to be seated. The place was very crowded, but people were walking in with no reservations, and we had reservations, so I didn't expect to wait very long. I am pretty patient with restaurants...especially on a Friday night, but this was ridiculous. I went up to the hostess twice, and she assured me.."2 minutes". She wasn't much of a hostess, neither was the other hostess they had (yes...2!). They didn't even have the courtesy to offer us a drink while we waited for over 30 minutes! We finally get seated, and the service was mediocre, and the food was also average. We had to wait about 15 minutes for the waiter to just come and take our order, and to top things off...we had to take our own check to the bar, so we could pay and get the heck outta there!! The waiter was slow..slow...slow. The only thing that was fast was the dessert, and that was good...lavender creme brule, but we were so over that place by the time we ate the dessert  we didn't enjoy it as much as we should have. We got out of there at close to 11 pm, with an 8 pm reservation.
My good friend and I ate here last night (a monday). We started with the special appetizer (cheese with fig paste wrapped in chard) of the evening. The food was so salty that I picked my way through it and my friend just ate the chard. The cheese tasted as if it was soaking in soy sauce all night. Then came our main dishes, beef ragu for my friend and the chicken stuffed with gruyere and prosciutto with beans and squash for me. Both dishes were a huge disappointment. My friend returned her ragu which was runny and tasteless, I picked at my chicken and finally gave up. It smelled and tasted gamey and I didn't see any cheese and just the littlest bit of prosciutto inside. The mushy squash tasted as if it had be marinated, again in something terribly salty. Good squash and chicken is so easy! We were so disappointed that we ultimately requested our $65 check and left to find better food down the street. Ultimately a huge disappointment. Maybe the sunday night chef has Monday's off? Whoever was in the kitchen needs to lay off the salt.
food - i wouldn't call it good. it was just okay. not a very exciting menu, except that they have this rabbit dish, which i tried without hesitation. atmosphere - i felt a little suffocated because we were all cramped into small seatings. dim lighting. quite loud. having a rabbit dish was the only event i remember now. we walked to the gelato classico to get some gelatos and sorbettos across the street to make up for oh-not-so-satisfying dining experience and to wash down those rabbits. i wouldn't come back for dinner but perhaps just for drinks.
FANTASTIC place.  One of only few places for date night with the wife.  Small portions/quality food make this an ideal restaurant in downtown.
This is has been our favorite little place to have wine flights for my girlfriend and I. Their small plates  and wine lists are incredible and changes pretty frequently... I've eaten at the tables and that's fine but we usually choose to sit at the bar with our favorite bartender, Virgina. She's flippin cool and definitely keeps us coming back. Probably the best server in world...
I went here for dinner this weekend as I was tempted to try it.  I made Open Table reservations.  I was running late so I called to let them know I would be 15 minutes late.  They were polite and helped to update my reservation time.  For appetizers, we had the cold calamari, cooked tuna with capers, and cooked cod.  Each were $5.  I liked the cod and the calamari.  We originally ordered a salad to split, but the entrees showed up before we got our salad.  They offered to take back the entrees, but we decided to cancel the salad as the 3 mini appetizers (for 2 people) were pretty fulfilling.  I had the halibut which came with mushrooms and spinach.  It was a huge chunk of halibut which was cooked really well.  My fiance had the fowl, which was pretty tasty.   For dessert, we ordered the profiteroles which were cream puffs with hazelnut cream.  They were yummy, but not great as expected.  I don't think I'll be going back as it wasn't worth what I spent for the food there.
nice ambience, extensive wine list, friendly staff.  i always get the same thing - gnocci w/ burned butter and sage - so i can't comment on the rest of the food but that dish is delicious if you like that sort of thing.  lavanda is on the pricey side, but portions are filling and the menu is inventive.
I came here today for a business lunch and were seated as soon as we came in. For appetizzers we had the figs wrappend in bacon. They were really good, great combination in flavor. The only down side was that each order only has 4 figs. We also ordered the calamari and it was too cripy and over cooked in my opinion. They also included the least amount of sauce for the calamari so by the time it got to the third person, the sauce was gone. For my lunch I ordered the salmon wrapped in grape leaves over couscous with roasted veggies. The roasted vegtables had a great smoky flavor and the fish was cooked perfectly. I didn't like to couscous; it was too dry and flavorless. The other person who was with us ordered the trout, but they later came out to tell us that they had run out. It was 12:30-- prime time lunch hour and they ran out of the lunch special. That was a bummer. Over all, the service was ok, not great and not bad. I would come back!
this place is decent.  nice place.  a tad fancy but it feels overrated considering their food isn't that great.  for italian and mediterranean food, the menu didn't really tickle my fancy. i didn't feel like there was a decent variety to choose from.  their pastas were all right but i've had better.  their veggies looked worn out and old (smaller dishes).  their hummus tastes like something you could buy yourself from trader joe's.  get yourself a peroni (good, light italian beer) and just head here for crappy appetizers.
This restaurant rocks! the food is spectacular, the service is impeccable, and the ambience is perfect. We came in with two of our friends and the food was amazing, our waitress was fantastic and the owner was very accommodating and polite. We loved the wine suggestion and the desserts were fantastic!
I came here with my wife and 11 close friends for dinner .great place and great food.  I must have tried 5 different dishes and they were all good .
My wife and I dropped in for apps and a salad.  Great wine selection, decent food....althugh the food was a bit heavy on the olive oil
I had Alaskan Halibut, my wife a grilled steak. Absolutely delicious! Classy atmosphere, fair prices and excellent service. Only wish a little broader menu selection. We'll be back (with my in-laws  :).
5/5!  The Lavanda is a great place for all occasions! The Food is great with a wide variety to choose from.  The appetizers are killer, but I caution you to not get carried away with them, because the entree's are just as delicious!  Lavanda has wonderful owners who make the night that much better! Lavanda also does the little things that count like fold your napkin while you are int he restroom etc!  Best dinner in Palo Alto!
Food was OK for a $20+ entree place.  Service was horrible.  Took 5 minutes to be noticed to take drink orders and another 10 to deliver them at the same time the server took the order.  Appetizers came out in a reasonable amount of time.  Then it was 45 minutes for the entrees!  Server at one point said "the food will be right up" then it was another 15 minutes.  No explanation, no offer of drink or anything, no sympathy.  Manager was worse and was unapologetic to us and the neighboring table.  Will never go back.  Only reason they get 2 stars and not 1 is the food when it arrived was OK.
I realize that most people come here for a full-on meal and  a hearty bottle of wine, but it works well for the small plates and half-bottles as well.  The Frog's Leap - Sauvignon Blanc was crisp and not too dry.  We tried 3 small plates: Squid, Artichokes and the chickpea fritata.  All but the squid were excellent.  I thought the squid was decent, but the presentation could have been a little bit better.  The squid was tasty though - just not enough of it.  Great ambiance and great service - our waiter was excellent!
I hadn't been to Lavanda in a really long time. The starters were good, not great. The halibut was great, really enjoyed it! Great wine! I will go back.
We went here on a Saturday night for my Mom's birthday. We told the hostess in advance we were celebrating a birthday. The food was okay, as other people indicated, the food really did not live up to the expectations. The small plates were the best part of the meal. The entrees (and we tried 5 different ones) were just okay, and honestly over priced for the taste/quality. The wine was decent. The server did not do anything for my mom-we were not looking for something "free" but more a recognition of a special occasion. I would only go back for wine and small plates a the bar.
Just went back - even better. Nice decor and fabulous pasta. I had the spaghetti with clams, and it was one of the best I've had. My friend had the flank steak, which she loved. Both our wines (one red, one white) were served way too cold. It took half the meal just to warm them up to the right temperature. I will definitely go back to this restaurant - but with a bottle of wine from my cellar.
I was underwhelmed by this restaurant and we were there for Croatian Food night.  I must say, Croatian wine is really good so they had that going.  We ordered a lot of little things and when I said I was underwhelmed, it means that I do expect to be wowed... and I wasn't!  The dessert was so-so as well.  The only thing that was really good, aside from the wine and the service, was the Braised Pork Loin.  I may be a little harsh on my review but if I shell out $80 for dinner (and that's just my share), I have high expectations.
This is the best restaurant we've found in Palo Alto so far.  The owners enjoy good food and wine, and want you to as well.  Ask for recommendations - and don't be shy.  We told them that we both enjoy beets, and they brought us the beets in truffle oil, which has become a staple order for us.  We told them that we enjoy a certain label of wine (definitely not the most expensive name in the world!) and they brought us the second label of a wine-maker that we now seek out when we go elsewhere.  We've learned a lot about food and wine, just by asking for Luka or Bruce, and then asking them questions.  You definitely don't get this kind of a personal involvement in the diner's enjoyment at most other restaurants in Palo Alto!
This was the worst restaurant experience I've had in a long time. I brought a group of six to dinner after a long business meeting. The service was horrible (we had to call for our waiter constantly), we had to wait forever for our entrees, and when we did get them, they were bland and uninspired (not just mine, but the entire table's). What an embarrassing choice of restaurants. To add insult to injury, the meal cost a small fortune! I will not go back. In contrast, we went to Mantra (632 Emerson Street, Palo Alto) the next night and had a fabulous meal for two-thirds the price.
This place is over rated!  I had some "Trader Joe's" wine for $10 a glass and some appetizer's.  The salty cod was probably purchased from Safeway in the frozen isle.  The calamari could have been used for bait and vince's avocado bread was the size of a cracker.......the only thing that was good though  Our bartender was decent.  There are many other spots to choose from in Palo Alto.  More on that later.
it's a place with C- food at B+ prices. Often noisy, an just as often good service. The food is just OK, not better than one could make at home, the small plates are the most interesting, avoid the main courses as they are so dull you'll find yourself asleep in mid bite. Cheese is pretty good, too. Wine is amazingly overpriced.
We try to come here every Sunday night for the excellent and surprisingly affordable $25 prix fixe 4 course dinners. Some very interesting and imaginative dishes. One of my favorites was a peach salad with honey, pistachios and feta. Unbelievable.
Lavanda is a high quality very solid restaurant -- not the most creative but quite good, high end mediterranean food.  They use fresh ingredients, tasty seasoning, so you cannot go wrong for either a romantic or a dinner with friends.  The slight one negative is that it is a fairly big restaurant and as a result is not always fully packed.  I like going to places that are smaller and fully packed, just a preference on my end.  I , however, will continue to go to Lavanda regularly.
My husband and I travel from San Jose, CA just to have Lavanda. It is on a rare occasion and usually a special one.  Our first experience was excellent. Second was good and hope the third is just as good. We do not have any complaints and look forward to our next visit!
Been to Lavanda many times, but apparently now on Friday's and Sunday's they have music during dinner service.  I didn't want to cook one Sunday so we went there.  What we thought would be a good meal out ended out being a romantic evening with amazing prices.  Pre Fix 3-course menu on Sunday's for $25 PLUS great, romantic music to dine by.  The food was good, wine and service was excellent and it was a great atmosphere.  Found out for V-Day they are not going to force an expensive pre-fix price on you and rush you out.... I think my hubby plans on taking me here for a nice evening.
Lavanda is our favorite neighborhood restaurant.  The owners are always friendly, as are the wait... Read more 
The service was good and they were willing to split an entree. The capanata, bacon wrapped dates, and prociiutto wrapped pears that were very good.  Lava cake and ice cream also very good but similar to that found at many places these days.  I usually enjoy sand dabs, but these were a little dry.  Good experience but not a special one.
